From my point of view, the literature program was shaped by women of a certain age based on their interests.
From Russian literature of the 19th century, we preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky.
They were writing fiction, of course, from the point of view of those very ladies of a certain age.
And the psychology and suffering of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting to teenagers.
Adolescents are rarely interested in the psychology of the heroes.
Thank you very much, very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were stuffed to represent a particular variety?
There are roses of this colour and with this petal structure, resembling velvet, usually dark red or burgundy.
And light-colored roses look different, the petals having a satin or silk-like sheen.
Sharks attack surfers, mistaking them for sea turtles...
Bulls seem to be colour-blind.
Bears eat carrion...
Gorillas MUST NOT be looked in the eye - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on them, looking away.
Bees are still guided by smell...
The Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105x195 mattress.
The "Micropack Prestige" model: comfort and natural ingredients.
The mattress has different firmness on each side: the medium-firm surface is made of latex-coated coconut fibre and natural latex, and the moderately soft side is made of a layer of natural latex.
A spring unit with 1000 springs per square metre quickly adapts to the body of the sleeper, preventing the "wave" or "hammock" effect.
Among the advantages of the model, it is worth noting the breathable materials.
Latex, perforated for breathability, is naturally ventilated as is coconut coir.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
Also, the mattress is covered by an extended warranty period.
The official warranty period from the manufacturer is 5 years, but in fact, the mattress can be used for longer than that.
Protection from dust and dirt is provided by a removable jacquard cover included in the package.
To go with your mattress, purchase an orthopedic pillow - it is recommended to support the optimal position of the spine during sleep.
The filling determines the purpose of the sides - the coconut serves as the anatomical support for the back, the latex relaxes the muscles.
Use your brain and get rid of such relatives!
It's better not to have any than ones like these...
Either find a third-party driver, or one who is willing to invest and work with you as a partner.
If it doesn't work out, then sell the car, even if it's at a loss, don't be stingy.
Next time you better think about it...
Andrei, you have been clearly explained that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in the command line.
The IT teacher can't help either, he wasn't taught this, the kids play games in Windows.
So there is no support.
I recall with horror these banquets and the guests at my parents' home.
Guests are at the door, and the cutlets are still cooking on the stove, and mother is sweeping the floor.
Lord, I already sat down at the table without any strength.
And then wash the dishes, clean the house.
A week before the holiday you drag products, two days of cooking, one day of cleaning up afterwards.
And what about the guests?
They are doing well, and they always bring a cake with them.
Since then, I do not like holidays and guests.
Even for my family, I set the table according to the minimum wage.
As for the treats, I prepare them for them and I bake them very often just for the sake of it.
Germany: Fourth COVID-19 vaccination is inevitable
A fourth vaccination will be required in the summer or fall of 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the last one, but will continue with renewed vigour.
Despite an aggressive vaccination campaign in Germany, two or three doses of the coronavirus vaccine will probably not be enough for full protection.
This is the belief of the head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigel.
This was reported by Die Welt on Saturday, December 11.
“We expect that the fourth vaccination will be required in the summer at the latest in the autumn”, the expert believes.
In addition, Wiegeldt hopes that the fourth corona vaccination can be carried out "in combination with the flu vaccination".
This will help to achieve the best results.
In addition, intensified vaccination can help fight the spread of the new coronavirus strain "Omicron".
Moreover, the new variant is particularly dangerous.
For example, the probability of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than with the Delta or Beta strains.
This is according to the results of a preliminary study conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, the BioNTech/Pfizer manufacturers plan to provide a vaccine adapted for Omikron by March 2022.
The companies emphasize that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new "Omicron" coronavirus variant.
The study by BioNTech and Pfizer showed that with two doses of the vaccine the effectiveness is significantly lower: "the neutralizing potential is reduced by more than 25 times".
"This indicates that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the Omicron variant," BioNTech and Pfizer stressed.
That's why a third dose is needed.
Experts insist that the pace of vaccination in the country be accelerated.
For example, Bernd Salzberger, chairman of the German Society for Infectious Diseases, is in favour of reducing the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, as Salzberger believes, accelerated vaccination will affect the spread of both the delta virus and the omicron variant of the coronavirus.
"The experience of Israel makes this very clear," the expert emphasized.
Pontoon21 wobbler, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (as well as the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed with ice fishing in mind, not just for trolling.
These vibs have a higher specific gravity than similar-sized analogs, which, without a doubt, has a positive effect on the nuances of the use of these interesting lures.
Another recognizable feature is the top fin made of tough and flexible plastic, creating additional shades of vibration on vertical and horizontal retrieves.
As a "winter vibe" the Bet-A-Vib shows a fairly aggressive action when fished vertically.
Often the most effective is a simple monotonous animation, that is, the movement of the lure up and down almost without pauses.
When planning, the deviation from the vertical axis is not very large, which is convenient when fishing in a confined space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, snags, and other obstacles that can cause a snag.
In addition, a small deviation is relevant when fishing for pike and large perch in winter, and especially in mid-winter, when a pinpoint and aggressive presentation of the bait is required.
On reaching the extreme point of its trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly reverses and returns to its original vertical position.
Bet-A-Vib is just as successful for winter fishing for pond trout.
To appease her whims, you can choose from two modifications: one with a sound capsule (NS - NanoSound) and one without it (SL - Silent).
It was also noted that the Bet-A-Vib is capable of annoying a passive pike that does not even react to a live bait.
When casting, the Bet-A-Vib shows distance and accuracy.
This wobbler is easy to understand and not finicky, it combines well with both monofilament and braided lines of even large diameters.
To catch pike, perch, roach, or perch, in addition to the uniform, the "step" is relevant, sometimes with "clicking" on the bottom.
If you are fishing in snaggy areas, you can change the front treble hook to a double hook, which will reduce the chances of snagging.
Among the lures of its class Bet-A-Vib is one of the most stable and, as a result, one of the most effective.
It can be used with equal success in both relatively shallow and fairly deep areas.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young layabouts are sitting on the necks of their elderly parents.
"The golden youth" are obviously layabouts by and large, who can't do anything and don't know anything.
A well-fed life is conducive to idleness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this significant part of the population.
You must be joking.
I've never seen a pair of shoes in this store that I wanted to buy.
What long-term wear are you writing about?
These shoes are made of fake leather.
It would be good if it can last for one season.
"Zenden" is at the same level as "Karri".
Go in a couple of times, have a look and understand that there is nothing to do in them.
7,000 Russian Mercenaries Reported in Libya
More than 7,000 mercenaries from the private military company (PMC) Wagner are in Libya.
This was announced on Sunday, 12 December, by the head of the republic's High State Council, Khaled al-Mishri.
“Currently, there are more than 7,000 mercenaries from the Wagner PMC in Libya.
They also have planes.
They are also digging trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 jet aircraft at the Ghardabiya airbase (which is also used as a civil airport in Sirte)," the Anadolu agency quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also pointed out that the Russian mercenaries are "trying to take over" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean Sea, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
To maintain presence
According to the publication's source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and “settled in Libya”.
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, using the airport and port in Sirte, as well as the airport in Jufra, the agency's publication notes.
Russian officials have officially denied that the Wagner PMC is receiving support from the Kremlin.
Where else could the mercenaries be?
According to the agency, "Wagner" is reportedly active in nine African countries - the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal security for leaders, and protection of energy facilities.
In return for these services, Wagner’s subsidiaries receive certain privileges and licenses for the use of minerals and natural resources, as well as for the supply of weapons, technologies and military services to these countries”, the article states.
As the media reports, the “Wagnerites” allegedly fought in Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan, and the Central African Republic.
This group is not listed in either the law enforcement agencies or in the register of legal entities, and its fighters are absent from the official lists of personnel.
The company is under U.S. sanctions.
Recall that earlier, the ambassadors of 27 EU countries approved restrictions against the “Wagner” group.
It is expected that the Council of the European Union will approve this decision on December 13.
The situation in Libya
The High State Council of Libya is effectively the second chamber of parliament with advisory functions, dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
This body has repeatedly called for the single voting day for the election of members of parliament and the head of state to be moved from 24 December to at least February 2022.
“Less than two weeks remain until the election, and the chances of it taking place on time are rapidly diminishing”, the article notes.
Against this background, Libya's High Electoral Commission has indefinitely postponed the announcement of the final list of candidates, the Sky News Arabia channel reports.
Russia's foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more successes than failures in the country’s foreign policy, 29% believe that there are more failures.
"Examples of successes are "we protected and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on "Nord Stream-2"", "we scared the whole world that we have a powerful weapon", "we took back Crimea".
The main failures are ‘conflict with Ukraine’, ‘confrontation with Western countries’, ‘isolation from the world’, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
The government of Dubai has gone completely paperless - all government services have also become digital only
The Dubai government has announced a complete abandonment of paper-based administration in favour of digital technologies.
All public services for the population will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This is reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new phase of digitizing all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully paperless government," Dubai's Crown Prince and Chairman of Dubai Executive Council Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum said on Saturday.
Now, internal and external document circulation in all government institutions in Dubai will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
The innovation affected all sectors without exception: healthcare, utilities, the police, municipal bodies, courts, etc. Many commercial structures have also joined the government’s initiative.
The transition to e-government and digitalization of document management began in Dubai in 2018.
In that time, according to officials, 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, which is equivalent to 14 million hours of human labor and $353.8 million.
Earlier, Moscow Mayor Sergey Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens two days a year.
Dana, well, about the date of birth and how old the child is, that's already senility, about the class and group in kindergarten too.
I just don't believe that such louts exist.
And if they do exist, they obviously don't care about anything, including the family.
My mother, her two brothers, and her grandfather and grandmother lived at 3 Vladimirskaya, on the first floor, without bars on the windows.
First they knocked on the door, then on the window, then they decided not to be polite and broke the window and climbed in, but grandpa had a baseball bat, which they received.
These people knew for sure that there was someone in the house...
Turkey's car production and exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November amid the lira's devaluation.
As a result, the industry’s performance for the first 11 months was worse than last year’s result, reports Bloomberg, citing data from the Turkish Automotive Manufacturers’ Association.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were released from the factories in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than a year earlier.
Approximately 75,900 cars were shipped for export, which is more than 25% less than last year's figure.
And if, by the results of the first 10 months of this year, the Turkish automobile sector demonstrated positive dynamics compared to last year, then by the results of the first 11 months of 2021, car production was already 0.3% worse than last year's figures.
The reason for such a fall was the sharp depreciation of the Turkish lira, which in November lost 29% of its value in relation to the dollar.
This has led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 SMEs received a deferral on loan payments in 2021
The First Deputy Prime Minister, Alikhan Smailov, spoke about the situation concerning the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, according to a Kazinform correspondent.
“According to information from the Republic of Kazakhstan Agency for Regulation and Supervision of the Financial Market, this year, in accordance with the instruction of the Head of State dated April 1, 2021, the Chairman of the Agency issued an order dated April 9, 2021, No. 127 “On the approval of the Procedure for granting payment deferrals on loans of small and medium-sized business entities”, - wrote Alihan Smailiev in his response to the MP’s request.
He reminded that the procedure for deferral of loan payments provided for the banks and organizations engaged in microfinance to provide deferral of loan payments for loans issued up to 1 April 2021 to MSMEs, including individual entrepreneurs, during the period from 1 April to 30 June 2021.
The deferral period was from 30 to 90 days at the discretion of the SME subject.
The borrower's statement may have indicated a different grace period.
During the period of deferral for the borrower, claim and legal proceedings were suspended, notification of the need to settle the overdue debt, as well as the collection of fees and other payments by the lender were suspended", the Deputy Prime Minister noted.
In 2021, second-tier banks received applications for loan payment deferrals from 603 SME borrowers, of which 553 SME borrowers received deferrals in the amount of 9.7 billion tenge.
131 MSMEs applied to the MFIs for a deferment, of which 95 MSMEs were granted a deferment in the amount of 105.8 million tenge," concluded A. Smailov.
The pulmonologist, Puryayev, suggested that people with a weak immune system are able to easily tolerate the “Omicron” strain.
A doctor suggested that people with a weakened immune system might be able to handle it easier than those with a strong immune response
The pulmonologist Sergey Puryazev explained why the omicron variant of the coronavirus may be dangerous.
The reason lies in the conditions under which the virus originated.
Scientists believe that the “okmirom” was born in the body of a person infected with HIV or suffering from immunodeficiency.
In other words, when mutated, it did not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
Because of this, he is more aggressive.
Because there wasn't an immune response, it became very quick.
Apparently, there are more of these spike proteins, thorns, than there should be, and their antibodies were not cut during the mutations, says pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev.
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may tolerate "okmiron" better than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong immune response to anything, to any infection, is not always a good thing.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is what happens with pneumococcal infections, when 30-year-olds die and 60-year-olds survive in the form of a cold.
A young person's immune response is out of control, it's completely inadequate: where a finger-wagging would have been enough, it's like firing a cannon at a sparrow, concluded Sergey Puryasev.
The doctor also recalled that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the most unpleasant of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial and viral.
If the first can be treated very successfully and quickly, in the second case you can often only treat the symptoms - all hope is in the body.
The first signs of developing pneumonia will be the beginning of intoxication of the body - this is a temperature, weakness, malaise.
Then come the respiratory symptoms: shortness of breath, a sore throat, a cough.
Pain on the right or left side or abdominal pain can also indicate a developing problem.
In the meantime, in Russia, by the end of the year, they may begin to vaccinate the younger generation from 12 to 18 years of age.
The virologist and head of the Laboratory of Genomic Engineering at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology, Pavel Volkov, noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
The number of contacts is the greatest for adolescents who go to school.
This is the most socially active group, as are the children of kindergartens, said Pavel Volkhov to Moscow 24, a virologist and head of the genome engineering laboratory at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology.
A huge thank you to the author for this article.
With pleasure I refreshed my memories...
Teath-In.
In those far-off seventies and eighties, no dance floor could do without the melodies of this group.
And at home, when they got together with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have proposed a hypothesis as to why people with obesity become victims of COVID-19
The researchers studied the fatty tissue left over from bariatric procedures and found that fat cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected by the coronavirus.
Immune cells located in the fatty tissue, the macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
The scientists also examined the fatty tissue of patients who died from COVID-19, and found coronavirus particles in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and influenza viruses can hide in fatty tissue, using it as a reservoir, in attempts to evade the immune system.
SARS-CoV-2 is probably also capable of doing this.
Biologist spoke about the reasons for the appearance of dementia
The Candidate of Biological Sciences, Semen Golosheykin, named the reasons for the appearance of dementia and told about ways to prevent it in an interview with the Sputnik radio station.
According to the World Health Organization, more than 55 million people suffer from this disease.
The syndrome is manifested by a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, a person with the syndrome has difficulty even in a familiar environment.
Golosheykin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head trauma, certain infections, metabolic disorders and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression and alcoholism.
At the behavioural level, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement may play a role," he said.
The development of dementia is also affected by bad habits - smoking, alcohol abuse, sleep disorders and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs, the expert noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate and a decrease in levels of abstract thinking.
"There is a discussion that hearing loss can be both an early sign of Alzheimer's disease and one of the risk factors for its development," the biologist added.
To prevent the development of the disease, WHO recommends maintaining a sufficient level of physical activity, training cognitive skills and abilities that require memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the department of neurology, neurosurgery and medical genetics of the Federal State Budgetary Educational Institution of Higher Education N.I. Pirogov Russian National Research Medical University.
N.I. Pirogova, head of the Department of Cognitive Disorders at the Federal Center of the Brain and Neurotechnology, Anna Bogolepova, spoke about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt returned about 30,000 artifacts illegally smuggled out of the country
Over the last 10 years, the Cairo government has managed to repatriate about 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
On Saturday, 11 December, the chief inspector of the Department of Returned Antiquities at the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad, announced this on the air of the Al-Hayat TV channel.
Since 2011, the Egyptian state has managed to return 29,300 artefacts.
In just this year, the Bible Museum in Washington has discovered 5,300 artifacts from ancient Egyptian civilization," he said.
Abdel Gawad clarified that all the smuggled artifacts are registered in the archives.
Currently, department employees are working on their return to Egypt.
In particular, the specialists “are tracking auctions all over the world and internet sales” via foreign and Egyptian websites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector explained that when they are returned, the cultural artifacts are restored and then put on display in museums.
According to him, one of the returned artifacts was an ancient human skeleton discovered in Belgium, which is now part of the collection of the National Museum of Egyptian Civilization in Cairo.
In 2020, the Egyptian authorities appealed to Interpol for help in finding a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun sold at an auction in London.
The Christie's auction house held a sale on July 4, at which the 3,000-year-old bust was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million rubles).
This was met with displeasure from Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims the artifact was illegally taken out of the Karnak Temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
The head of Tutankhamun, depicted as the sun god Amun, had been in a private collection and had not been offered for sale since 1985.
It is unknown how the relic came to Europe.
In recent years, Egypt has actively pursued the repatriation of antiquities illegally removed from the country at different times.
According to the authorities, 95% of the contraband antiquities are the result of archaeological excavations by “black diggers”.
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, because the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are an independent people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, then only 42 thousand people - that is how many Tatars (Kazan) live in Crimea (see the census).
Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
The only thing that unites them is the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants access to employees' personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse is requiring employees to give the bank access to their personal mobile devices, the Financial Times reports.
The fact is that in Europe and the USA, the Swiss bank does not issue its employees corporate communication devices, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner - a telecommunications operator.
Under current rules, a bank can look at information on corporate devices issued to its staff as they are used for business purposes with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to check mobile devices in extreme cases - for example, if an employee used it to arrange a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now that many employees are working remotely, the bank wants to extend the rule to all devices used for work.
According to the newspaper, the bank’s management has set a deadline for employees to become familiar with the new rule.
Credit Suisse has not officially commented on the new requirement.
Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200 mattress.
In the center of the Vivre Dual royal mattress is a quality and durable TFK 18 high-autonomy spring block.
The natural coconut base layers add stiffness, the zoned latex distributes the load more effectively, the latex with Aloe Vera provides hygiene for the sleeping area and the relief foam relaxes.
A mattress with symmetrical medium firmness and a large height (30 cm).
The product is supplied in a tight roll and is ready for use within a short time after unpacking.
The cover is made from a strong knitted fabric with quilting on a comfortable layer.
The fabric of the cover does not wrinkle or stretch over time.
Part 4
The last year of Sergei Yesenin's life - 1925 - was productive in terms of creativity, but the most difficult for the poet's earthly existence and his "ego".
He's already out of any literary associations, he's done with imagism, he's on his own, but he's famous, in demand, sometimes strongly criticised by critics, even maliciously, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
Over the course of the year, more than 60 poems were written, many of which are true masterpieces, the cycle "Persian Motifs" was completed, the poem "Anna Snegina" was written, and 8 books were published, including the collection "Soviet Rus'".
And the main success was at the end of June 1925, when Gosizdat concluded a contract with Yesenin for the publication of his works in three volumes.
None of Sergey Alexandrovich's contemporary poets have been so honored; he is the first!
Moreover, it promised very good money – according to the contract, the salary was 1,000 roubles a month for 20 months (the plant director, for example, received 300 roubles a month, and an engineer received 200 roubles).
Money was needed more than ever that year.
Yesenin married the granddaughter of Leo Tolstoy, Sofia Tolstaya. He needed to arrange family life, support his sisters, Katya and Sasha, and his mother.
It would seem that life was getting back on track, there is something to be happy about, but for him, everything is painted in mainly dark tones, as if the nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after the death of Yesenin) had materialized:
My friend, my friend,
I'm very, very ill.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Either the wind is whistling
Over an empty and deserted field,
Is it like a forest in September,
Alcohol is a brain-destroyer.
Many acquaintances noted that Yessenin had significantly deteriorated, looks bad, and is obviously ill.
More and more frequent are the tantrums, the nervous breakdowns.
And the reason is probably not just alcoholism...
However, if such a diagnosis - alcoholism - was given to Sergey Alexandrovich by someone, there are no reliable documents left.
For example, those from May 1923, when Yesenin, at the insistence of his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, recovered his health in a clinic near Paris, under the care of Professor Peter Gannushkin (Yesenin will return to him two years later, already in Moscow).
But there is no shortage of evidence of the poet’s drinking sprees, scandals on this subject, and run-ins with the police; they are scattered across dozens of memoirs.
Since the early 1920s, the poet's terrible affair with the green snake has developed rapidly.
At the end of the summer of 1923, Yesenin moved in with a friend, the imagist Ivan Starcev, for a short time.
Surprisingly, despite having a pretty good income, Esenin never had his own place to live in Moscow or in St. Petersburg; instead, he lived in rented apartments, hotels, or with acquaintances.
Starcev recalls:
"He only came to sleep, and most of the time in an insane, drunk state.
One day, returning at four in the morning, Yesenin fell on the landing...
When I fell, I scraped my face and wheezed.
After regaining consciousness, he began to cough non-stop, spattering the entire bed with blood..."
Even Esenin himself, after a tour of Europe and the USA (there was a dry law in the States at that time, but Duncan took a decent supply of alcohol with her) admitted:
"All I saw there were pigs and streets...
By the end, I couldn't even remember people's names...
Well, and he drank, of course...
And I drank because I was homesick."
Pirelli (Pirelli) Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V tyre
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tire, based on a high-strength mixture of rubber and silica, provides long-term effective operation, uniform wear, and resistance to loads.
The linear tread pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre, which forms ribs, guarantees low rolling resistance and directional stability.
Four deep grooves effectively remove water and dirt from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tread, suppress sliding and aquaplaning.
The patterned 3D lamellas increase traction on a slippery road, in snow and on ice.
The large shoulder blocks increase the lateral grip of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre during manoeuvres, increase traction, and reduce the braking distance.
The small grooves and serrations divert the heat.
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195 mattress
Pромтекс-Ориент Duet Latex Econom is a modern interpretation of a budget model in the premium class line.
The base of the mattress is the Duet independent double spring block.
A smaller, softer spring is inserted inside the large spring.
This allows the load on the mattress to be distributed evenly.
Both sides of the mattress are filled with a filler - artificial latex.
It's the equivalent of natural latex, but it's denser and less expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort effect of the mattress.
Synthetic latex is hypoallergenic, it does not absorb moisture and dust.
The mattress is perfect for a couple with a large weight difference (30 kg or more).
Thanks to the "smart" springs, there is no wave effect here, when the light partner slides to the side of the heavy one.
The pleasant, soft-to-the-touch cover made from practical jacquard Sense is lined with a layer of synthepon.
Natural fibers do not hold static electricity.
It may be possible to make this mattress model in a rolled-up version (vacuum roll-packing).
Now the son is almost 16, and he hasn't felt the urge to masturbate for a long time.
All his energy is focused on choosing what he will do to make a living.
He's a lot more responsible than I was at his age or my husband was before he got married, who periodically had run-ins with the law.
The father cares for his young daughter.
And loves, as Lermontov wrote, "in a strange way".
Why did the girl cry during the exam, when she hadn't even failed it yet?
Why didn't he tell his daughter that it wasn't a school.
Well, it will have a tail.
So what?
It will be resubmitted.
This is known to millions of students.
What are we even talking about?
Poland's foreign ministry says Belarus using migrants as 'weapon' against EU
Poland’s Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus is using migrants as a ‘weapon’
The Deputy Minister of Foreign Affairs of Poland, Pawel Jablonski, expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus, Alexander Lukashenko, used refugees as a “weapon” against the European Union and intends to return to such an “operation” next year.
The deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs made a corresponding statement in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Jablonski, the sanctions against Belarus have temporarily “stopped Lukashenko”, but he is “actively looking for new ways”.
The Polish official is also sure that now illegal migrants will be used as a weapon "in many parts of the world."
As the kp.ru website wrote earlier, the European Union implemented the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
It affected 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
Europe announced its readiness to further expand the restrictive measures against the republic "if the situation in the country does not improve".
In response, Minsk imposed a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that had previously decided to impose sanctions against Belarus.
Clothing cover 60×100 cm, spandex, blue.
To make your clothes last longer, you need to care for them properly.
Proper storage will prolong its life and keep it looking its best.
A garment bag will help us with this!
Advantages.
With a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
This is especially true if you have a lot of things and a small closet.
Neat exterior.
No more dresses, cardigans and skirts hanging out of place.
The neat covers allow clothes to be sorted and hidden from prying eyes.
For people who use posts instead of a regular closet, this is the best option.
The cover provides reliable protection from dust and dirt, insects, mechanical damage or possible fading.
Prevents the clothing from changing shape during long-term storage and prevents creases from forming.
The features of clothing covers.
The special material will allow your clothes to “breathe”.
With proper care, the lifetime of such a cover is not limited.
They can be used to store not only clothes, but also bedding, pillows and bed linen.
The case is "sealed" with a strong zipper.
It's important to remember!
Pre-pack items for long-term storage: clean them, iron them.
Choose a cover of the optimal size: items should not be folded at the bottom.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky items in one suitcase: they may get creased.
If you value order and neatness, care about your things, want to preserve them and extend their life, order a garment bag.
Visit the large catalogue and choose the item in the colour and size you want at a bargain price!
"Not for Senya's cap": when the velvet jacket turns a man into a laughingstock
Velvet jackets dominated the 2021 social scene.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion choice was Daniel Craig.
Back in September, he appeared at the premiere of the film "No Time to Die" in a velvet mauve jacket and the traditional "Bond" bow tie.
He was followed twice by Prince William, who first wore a green velvet jacket to the Earthshot Prize awards ceremony that was not in keeping with royal dress code, and then chose a more classic option for an event in support of the Royal Variety charity.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend was adopted by Lionel Messi.
The football player came to collect his seventh ‘Golden Ball’ in a Dolce & Gabbana velvet jacket.
By the way, his sons were dressed the same way.
AliExpress has already noted a growing demand for velvet men's jackets in Russia.
According to the service’s analysts, as reported by Gazeta.Ru, they have been bought 1.4 times more frequently.
The most popular are the warm velvet jackets with a lining and a fitted silhouette, the main colors are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue, and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is between 3,000 and 6,000 roubles. At the same time, men prefer to buy only jackets - they choose velvet suits less often.
They can be purchased not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, velvet blazers are being offered this season by practically all brands, including Brioni, Paul Smith, Etro, and Saint Laurent.
The most sought-after model is considered to be the Gucci one, in which the brand’s ambassador, Jared Leto, appeared at one of the premieres of the film “House of Gucci”.
When choosing a jacket from a high-end brand, you can be sure that the velvet is made from silk.
Thanks to a special method of interweaving the threads, a dense fabric with a fluffy outer texture and a smooth inner side is obtained.
Less expensive options are made from cotton or polyamide, but as a result, they last less.
Lamoda fashion expert Ilya Vakhochkin warns that when it comes to a velvet jacket, the main thing is not its model or style, but its appropriateness.
"Velvet requires an evening light, so such a jacket is ideal if you're going to a party or a formal event," explains Vakhshtein. "It's also suitable for those occasions when the dress code is "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie".
Another important criterion that allows one to make a choice in favor of a velvet jacket is the status of its buyer.
"A man in a velvet jacket should first of all acquire the right advanced circle of friends with wealth," the authors of the Telegram channel about men's fashion "Handsome Brammell" believe. "The owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the group of people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to social events, which always have a dress code.
Ilya Vakhoshin proposes to combine a velvet jacket with other smart items: classic trousers with creases, solid shirts, silk ties, tasselled loafers, brooches.
Too simple and everyday things will look out of place.
The fashion experts from “Beau Brummell” are sure: it will be inappropriate for a regular employee to appear in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if we are talking about “a manager among those who are in charge of this event, then “yes”, such a thing is in theme for him”.
If the employee is of a lower rank, and his goal is to move up in the complex hierarchy of the company or to get financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a velvet jacket.
Management will definitely appreciate the phrase "not for Senya's cap," the editors of the Telegram channel about men's fashion believe.
I have very mixed feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural timbre, so strained.
And it has nothing to do with the sweet face of a young girl.
Honestly, I don't understand the admiration of those around me.
But I sincerely wish him good luck in life!
It's all about money - alternative energy is well lobbied, that is, it's paid for.
Billions of investments.
Are they sad?
No, the price of electricity has gone up.
Traditional energy is also not in the red - gas, oil, and coal were bought cheaper than they are being sold now.
There is wild demand for fuel.
A penny drips.
And who is in the gap, then?
As usual, he was just a regular customer.
Does the sheriff care about Indian problems?
Therefore, Western politicians should not be considered idiots who “missed” the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a modest fee.
I didn't see any beautiful people in the photos in the article.
It's just mediocrity in the context of the average passenger.
Perhaps, if such characters are so sure of their beauty that they decide to show it to everyone on the train, then they probably won't get on with such people, most likely.
But only because of the mental disorder and ignorance of such "beauts", but not because of their appearance.
Khasbek, "a slave who is aware of his slave status and fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
The slave who is not conscious of his slavery and who wallows in a silent, unconscious, and wordless life of a slave is simply a slave.
A slave who drools with self-satisfaction as he describes the delights of slave life and waxes lyrical about his kind and good master is a lackey, a sycophant."
An immunologist has stated that revaccination after 4-5 months will help protect against the "omicron" strain of the coronavirus.
Revaccination after four-five months may protect against the new strain of the coronavirus infection "omicron".
Such a statement was made by the immunologist Nikolay Kryuchkov, who called the six-month vaccination, taking into account the appearance of a new strain, "a very long period"
"With the previous strains, such a time period was normal, but now it is best to conduct the procedure after five months, and for people with chronic conditions - after four," the expert said, calling for revaccination to be carried out in parallel with the vaccination campaign.
Kruglov also noted that early revaccination provides a good level of neutralising antibodies.
“If a person has had two vaccinations and a booster, or has had the disease and been vaccinated, or been vaccinated and had the disease, then they have ‘hybrid immunity’, i.e. they have a lot of antibodies and enough neutralising antibodies”, the expert clarified.
The G7 has warned Russia of "severe consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine
The G7 countries (the UK, Germany, Italy, Canada, the USA, France and Japan) published a statement following the meeting of foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It emphasizes that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be very expensive" for Moscow, but specific measures are not described in the document.
"We, the foreign ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom, and the United States, and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
Next, the ministers called on Russia to "de-escalate, use diplomatic channels, and comply with its international commitments on military transparency," as U.S. President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Putin on December 7.
"We reaffirm our support for the efforts of France and Germany in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements with a view to resolving the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the G7 foreign ministers also declared.
The use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited by international law.
Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have massive consequences and severe costs," they warn.
We reaffirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine, and the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome Ukraine's moderate position.
We will intensify our cooperation on our common, comprehensive approach," the statement added.
Earlier in the day, British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss said Russia would face "serious consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
According to her, this meeting showed the "united voice of the G7 countries, which account for 50% of world GDP, and which have made it very clear that an invasion of Ukraine would have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found to be 32 times less effective against Omicron strain
The effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times lower compared to other types of the disease.
This conclusion was reached by researchers from the University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong, according to the South China Morning Post (SCMP).
The vaccine was found to be less effective based on a study of the antiviral activity in citizens who received two doses of the COVID-19 drug.
"We see that most people had a high level of anti-viral activity against the original variant of Sars-CoV-2, but this ability was significantly reduced against the omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris said.
At the same time, the scientists stressed that vaccination remains the most reliable way to protect against a severe course of the disease when infected with the coronavirus.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of the coronavirus pandemic, taking into account the influence of the omicron strain.
The researchers concluded that the omicron variant could cause a new wave of viral circulation and an increase in deaths unless additional measures are taken.
Ukraine’s Defense Minister Accuses Germany of Blocking NATO Arms Deliveries to Kiev
The head of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine, Aleksey Reznikov, accused the government of the former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking the purchase of deadly weapons by Kyiv in the framework of NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov recalled that last month Germany vetoed the purchase of anti-sniper systems and rifles for shooting down drones by Ukraine.
At the same time, it is noted that later Berlin softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as non-lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev intends to acquire the aforementioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, we are talking about the United States, the United Kingdom, Lithuania, and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government under Chancellor Olaf Scholz on allowing arms deliveries to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, Ukraine’s ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kiev should not expect deliveries of weapons from Berlin under Chancellor Scholz.
According to him, the previous leadership of the Federal Republic of Germany explained its refusal to provide weapons by the risk of developing a military escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the “occupation by Russia” of part of the Ukrainian territory.
The diplomat is sure that Germany will maintain the same “illogical” position even with a new chancellor.
In August, Ukrainian leader Volodymyr Zelenskyy said Kiev expected assistance from Berlin in equipping its naval fleet.
Ukraine hopes that Germany will be “a partner of Ukraine in a technical sense”, added the president.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chairman of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he spoke in favor of selling defensive weapons to Kiev.
Sergey NOSOV 2, no, poor eyesight has nothing to do with it.
Type "I" instead of "E"?
Allowing a lot of commas?
And write instead of write.
No, you are an illiterate person.
And for a philologist, this is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, includes game board, 2 rods, 5 figures, 3AA batteries not included, box.
This electric children's fishing toy is a fun and educational toy for children.
While playing, the kid will train their fine motor skills, develop dexterity, accuracy, and attention.
As soon as you turn on the toy, 5 miniature fish will start swimming around in the simulated pond to a cheerful melody.
The child's task is to catch them all on the hook!
You can play on your own or with a friend: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy works with 3 x 1.5V AA batteries (not included).
The size of the playing field (LхWхH) is 21х17х4 cm.
The item is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenyev Prize have been announced in Moscow - Russian Gazette
A solemn ceremony to award the winners of the third season of the All-Russian literary prize “Far East” named after
V.K. Arsenyev passed in Moscow.
As reported on the prize's Instagram page, a total of 89 applications were submitted to the organizing committee this season.
63 players made the cut.
The leaders in terms of the number of submitted works are Primorye and Khabarovsk Krai - 13 and 11 applications, respectively.
More than 60 works were nominated for the award in three categories: "Long prose", "Short prose", "Children's prose".
Nine works made the shortlist - three in each category.
The winner in the ‘Long Prose’ category was Alexander Filkin (Primorsky Krai) with the book ‘The Inscription on the Gospel’.
The prize for the winner was presented by the Deputy Prime Minister and Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the Far Eastern Federal District, Yuri Trutnev.
In the Short Prose category, Love Bezbakh (Sakhalin Region) was recognized as the best author for her work "Whisper of the Night Rain".
She received the award from the Russian Minister for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the ‘Children’s prose’ category, the award went to the Trans-Baikal writer Nina Belomestnova and her ‘Golden Thread’.
The author was awarded by the scriptwriter, writer, candidate of philology and chairman of the Jury of the Andrei Gelasimov Prize.
All of the winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
Recall that within the framework of the "Far East" award, the authors of the best works on Far Eastern themes are awarded.
The main goal of the prize is not only to reward the winners and talk about contemporary authors, but also to draw cultural interest to the Far East, as an area of priority development in the 21st century.
Novels, short stories, collections of short stories or tales, as well as documentary prose and memoirs may be nominated.
At the same time, the author's place of residence is irrelevant, the main thing is to write in Russian.
Official website of the prize: https://premia-arsenyeva.ru/.
Frying pan, d=22 cm, with handle, dark marble colour, 4278884.
Kukmara's "marbled" cookware is made from cast aluminium and coated in an innovative, water-based marble non-stick coating reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
Features of the “Marble” tableware series.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom excludes deformation of the body, guarantees durability, and ensures the necessary strength of the coating.
The high-strength, non-stick, marble-based coating is water-based and reinforced with ultra-hard mineral particles.
Eco-friendly non-stick coating without PFOA (perfluorooctanoic acid).
Perfect heat distribution across the entire surface of the cookware, long-lasting heat retention.
The possibility of using a minimum amount of fat.
The non-stick marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exceptional durability of the coating during use.
Minor scratches and small abrasions on the surface of the pot do not affect the properties of the non-stick coating or the longevity of the cookware.
The products do not burn and keep their taste.
The ability to prepare tasty and healthy food without the addition of oil, like on hot stones.
Thickened bottom up to 6 mm.
High thermal conductivity and ergonomics.
Easy to wash.
It's suitable for all types of hobs, except induction.
It can be washed in the dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A high-strength non-stick coating based on water, reinforced with particles of super-hard minerals.
A reinforced soil layer.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The cast aluminium body is up to 6 mm thick.
The outer non-stick coating is “marble”.
Kukmara's kitchenware will allow any housewife to turn the ordinary cooking process into a pleasant and easy task.
Years... a long time ago, I did the same renovation.
Joined the living room with the kitchen.
It is a three-room apartment.
It was.
Of course, the project, permission, new technical passport, everything according to the law.
A bookcase and a large wardrobe were built in the hallway.
The door to the kitchen was bricked up, and a lot of space was created.
In almost 10 years living in this apartment, we have never regretted our decision.
Among the mistakes, they installed a fancy shower cabin instead of a bath.
I regret it a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I like rum.
But the beautiful world of rum is still closed to me, except for Bacardi and Captain Morgan.
What else would you recommend, and where could one start this wonderful acquaintance?
I also had it.
I won't get the vaccine.
He came to Chernomorsk for “rehabilitation”.
Only the weather didn't work out...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds won't nest in the bright houses as they attract too much attention, ask the ornithologists.
In addition, the paint and other chemicals will deter the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I'll definitely try it.
And what does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
What kind of apples should I use for this recipe?
It's really tasty.
I add a little bit more onion and a green apple.
Try it.
Just recently, the zombie network said that the production of automobiles is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen showing which country produces what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably chips-microcontrollers).
Russia was not on that list.
That's how it is!
In the United States, with their expensive labor force, it is advantageous, and for us in Russia, it is not advantageous!
But my mother-in-law was driving me crazy.
I feel sorry for her, she's not with us.
If I had seen good in her, things could have been different.
But beyond the hatred, gossip, and scandals, there is nothing else to remember.
I feel sorry for her, she lived her life in anger.
"Mercedes" has protested the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German Mercedes team, whose driver Lewis Hamilton finished second at the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, behind Red Bull driver Max Verstappen, filed a protest against the final results of the race, the Formula 1 press service reported.
Mercedes considers that the Formula 1 rules 48.12 and 48.8 were violated during the race.
In the first case, the German team is contesting the judges' decision to return the lap racers one lap behind the leaders.
According to the second, Verstappen passed Hamilton before the allowed "restarted" zone.
We will add that now the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Verstappen beat Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 World Championship, is preliminary, when the protests of "Mercedes" will be considered is unknown
G7 warns Russia of consequences for Ukraine invasion
Foreign ministers of the G7 warned of "severe consequences" for Russia if it continues military aggression against Ukraine, according to a final statement by the parties.
Participants in the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of Russian armed forces at the country's borders.
"There should be no doubt in Russia's mind that further military aggression against Ukraine will have massive consequences and severe costs," a statement published on the UK government's website said.
G7 foreign ministers and the EU's top diplomat said they were "united in their condemnation of Russian military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss warned of "serious consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine at a press conference in Liverpool.
We have made it clear that any invasion will have massive consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to stop its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier, at the summit in Liverpool, the G7 foreign ministers agreed that to resolve the crisis caused by the build-up of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, the parties needed to return to the negotiating table.
This was about talks in the “Normandy format”.
The North Atlantic Alliance also spoke out in favor of a dialogue on Ukraine in the “Normandy format”.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Maria Zakharova stated that, by calling on Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 "have signed their inability to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
Homsu Diamond belt bag.
The Diamond waist bag is perfect for sports, travel or just a walk.
It is convenient to take with you, it is roomy, it is made from strong and light fabric.
The main section opens with a zipper, which can be done with ease even while walking.
The stylish and bright design is perfect for those ladies who really have a fine taste for accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19х12х7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, allowing it to accommodate various items, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material allows the belt bag to be easily washed using various household products.
For convenience, you can use a special adjuster for the strap size.
Ways to get back money stolen via online stores revealed
There are several ways to get your money back from an online shop and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed them in a conversation with RBC.
For example, in order to reduce the risk of significant losses in the event of the bank card falling into the hands of a criminal, it is recommended to keep the main funds on the card or a bank account that is not used for online shopping.
Part of the savings can be set aside in a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend keeping a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen during purchases in stores that do not use the 3D Secure security technology, you can initiate a chargeback procedure.
"According to the rules set by the payment systems, for unauthorized transactions carried out without the use of 3D Secure, responsibility is placed on the participant in the payment chain who does not use this service," clarified the representative of Promsvyazbank.
An expert from international payment provider Ecommpay, Artur Zaremba, emphasized that the buyer has the right to file an application with the bank to dispute the fraudulent operation no later than 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the criminal used the card on online resources that do not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases online stores themselves return the funds to the client if the order has not yet been sent for delivery.
On November 19, a member of the Public Chamber and Director of the Internet Safety League, Ekaterina Mizulina, reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 complaints were received on various cases of fraud: from the sale of counterfeit documents to the theft of personal data.
According to her, an effective solution in the current circumstances may be the creation of a single window for complaints about online fraudsters.
Scholz has arrived in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
Newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz has arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis on the border with Belarus, the independence of the judiciary in Poland, the buildup of Russian troops on the Ukrainian border and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Scholz has spoken of his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for years to come, the leaders of the two countries have expressed clear expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki said he would urge Scholz to speak out against the "Nord Stream 2" pipeline, which is expected to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Moravec, Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
In turn, Germany supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin said it would help Warsaw and Brussels to resolve this crisis.
However, Poland's judicial system remains one of the reasons for disagreement.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, ruling that judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine, and its top court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
Germany's new government, sworn in on Wednesday, has not made public commitments to shut down Nord Stream 2 in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine, despite calls from Poland and the United States.
U.S. officials have told members of Congress that they have reached an understanding with Germany to halt the gas pipeline if Russia invades Ukraine, a senior U.S. congressional official said on Tuesday.
German officials did not confirm the reports, but Scholz warned on Wednesday of the consequences if Russia were to cross Ukraine's border, and this position was reiterated by G7 representatives on Sunday.
Dmitry, look more closely.
The view out the window is the same, and the size of the window hasn’t changed.
The wall between the kitchen and the room was removed, so the second window is partially visible.
In general, those who are not familiar with the initial plans are in doubt.
And I know such apartments very well and I can clearly see how it was remodelled.
Let everything go well for them.
It always surprises me when they write about means to clean sinks, toilets, window sills, taps.
You wash them once a year at Easter, or something like that, which means you have to scrub them clean.
Just don't get dirty.
The Ministry of Digital Development wants to reward writers with residencies
The future Fund for the support of Russian writers will receive federal property that was inherited from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
Writers' residencies will be created on its basis, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media, which will become the founder of the fund, told Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of a fund to support Russian writers.
The explanatory note clarifies that the fund will be charged with ensuring, among other things, the targeted use and preservation of the buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union of Writers and the Litfund.
“A significant number of real estate objects, previously belonging to the Literary Fund of the USSR, have passed into the ownership of the Russian Federation, including objects located in the writers’ village of Peredelkino, the village of Komarovo in the Leningrad region, and others”, the press service of the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media told Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The draft decree requires that the Fund's articles of association reflect that it is "established for the purpose of supporting literary activity by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers."
“By ‘creating conditions for creative activity’, we mean creating writers’ residencies on the basis of the property being transferred in different regions of Russia, where there would be comfortable conditions for creativity”, explained the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media to our publication.
520 rubles for one sliced tomato?
The cheese tortilla is literally a slice of dough from a package for 550 roubles.
3 pieces of fish in a beaker for 570…
No, it looks, of course, delicious, but the price is just insane.
On Belorusskaya, apparently, only rich people have gathered.
Doctors warn of risks of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yarceva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the danger of the uncontrolled use of blood-thinning drugs after contracting the coronavirus infection COVID-19 and before vaccination against the coronavirus.
The general practitioner, immunologist Irina Yarceva told that independent prevention of the possible formation of blood clots after COVID-19 can provoke a stroke.
Yartseva explained that blood-thinning drugs are not prescribed to everyone, only if the patient was hospitalised, was an inpatient, and had complications.
The doctor will prescribe anticoagulants (blood thinners that prevent the formation of clots) as necessary.
She reported that currently there is a state of ignorance - everyone is taking anticoagulants for a long time and getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding into the brain) as a result.
The chief prophylactician of the Urals Federal District, the scientific director of the Society of Specialists in Preventive Medicine, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Sergey Tokarev, told URA.RU in an interview that Russians now often take anti-coagulants indiscriminately and before vaccination against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens are listening to dubious advice on the Internet and beginning to self-medicate.
There are such citizens who, on their own initiative, start taking anticoagulants a week before vaccination.
And before the vaccination, the doctors notice bruises during the preliminary examination.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without finding out the cause of any symptom.
Potatoes have been named a superfood to protect against high blood pressure
Research has shown that regular consumption of this common and affordable vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and trace elements, which promote the functioning of the internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving circulation and lowering cholesterol levels, reports the Semana portal.
Heart disease is now the leading cause of premature death in people.
To improve the situation, you need to not only get treatment, but also eat properly.
One of the assistants in such a situation will be ordinary potatoes.
According to scientists, this root vegetable is very rich in vitamins B1, B3, B6, and also contains a very important vitamin C for the body.
Also, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, as well as riboflavin, folic acid, and pantothenic acid.
Micronutrients help all the internal systems of the body to work efficiently.
Apart from everything else, the root vegetable fights natural age-related disorders in the body, contains a lot of beneficial fibre for the digestive system.
With regular consumption, it can become a preventative for atherosclerosis and high blood pressure.
I had such a case.
A lady came to look at the apartment.
I came from another city to show it.
The advertisement included detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She remained extremely dissatisfied, because there was no "glamorous" kitchen and "glamorous" balcony.
The aunt, apparently, has nothing to do, so she's looking at other people's apartments, and people are wasting their time.
About 145,000 adolescents received the first component of the COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information has been published on the vaccination of adolescents, pregnant and breastfeeding women against coronavirus in Kazakhstan, reports the Kazinform news agency, citing the Ministry of Health Care to Prevent the Spread of COVID-19.
Twenty people have died from the coronavirus and pneumonia in a day in Kazakhstan. 85 coronavirus patients are in a critical condition - the Ministry of Health of the Republic of Kazakhstan. Most regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" for the coronavirus.
As of December 11, 2021, 181,037 people have received the first component of the Pfizer vaccine, and 14,580 people have received the second component.
Of these, 144,613 were teenagers, 10,645 were pregnant women and 25,779 were breastfeeding women.
The second dose: teenagers - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The plumber who found the money in the wall of the church will receive $20,000
The plumber who found money in the wall of a church in the American state of Texas will receive a reward.
This was reported in a press release from the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident took place at a large evangelical church in Lakewood, where Pastor Joel Osteen preaches a message of wealth and prosperity for faithful Christians.
In November 2021, plumber Justin Cooley was repairing one of the church's toilets and found, under the insulation, thousands of packets with money and checks.
He turned the find over to the church, he said, and received not even a thank-you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand what you did and what you could have done,'" KPRC-TV quoted him as saying.
The find appears to be related to a theft that took place at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
Then, about $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in checks were stolen from the church safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer a loss.
Nevertheless, a reward of $25,000 was offered for information about the perpetrators.
Justin Cooley couldn't claim that amount because the award had already expired.
Despite this, the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston, which initially put up a $5,000 reward and later received an additional $20,000 in a donation from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that the police had questioned Pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the wall of the Lakewood Church.
Tanya, her statements, her actions - this is her characteristic as a “real person”.
That is why it has such a negative attitude.
And it’s not because “she is financially significantly richer than all the writers”, as it is written here.
There are people who are richer, but not all of them behave so brazenly, so defiantly, as this lady.
The Promatex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
The Soft Cocos 1 spring orthopedic mattress.
It is based on the TFK block (256 springs per square metre).
Individually mounted springs help to distribute the load properly.
Coconut coir (the material made from the fibers of the coconut palm) is used as a filler.
Layers of felt are placed between the filler and the spring block.
Both sides of the mattress are above average in terms of firmness.
Jacquard Sense removable cover: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The density of the fabric is 116 g/m².
Again, simple and tasty.
I was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
They gave us a chicken.
Our friends grew it on their farm.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I want to make it a little more tasty.
I'm looking for a recipe for chicken baked in pieces in beer.
Have you tried it?
I trust you more than just recipes from the Internet.
China has recorded a new case of human infection with the bird flu virus
A new case of human infection with the highly pathogenic avian influenza virus H5N6 has been recorded in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station with reference to a notification from the Hong Kong health authorities, according to TASS.
A 68-year-old resident of Huai'an District in southern Guangdong province was infected with the disease, who kept poultry at home.
His condition is described by doctors as critical.
The world's first human infection with the H5N6 virus strain was recorded in May 2014 in southwest Sichuan province.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has risen to 53.
In Brazil, citizens are required to present vaccination passports when entering the country
In Brazil, they have made it mandatory for those entering the country to have a COVID-19 passport. This decision was made by Federal Supreme Court (STF) judge Luiz Roberto Barroso.
CNN Brasil reported this.
Citizens who have contraindications to vaccination are exempt from presenting a vaccination certificate.
The list of exemptions also includes people coming from countries where it has been proven that there is no vaccine.
"The situation is even more serious considering that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's, pre-Carnival and Carnival parties, and other events, which suggests an increase in tourist traffic," said Barros.
Previously, Brazilian authorities required tourists who were not vaccinated against COVID-19 to observe a five-day quarantine.
COVID-19 full protection scheme revealed
The virologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Honoured Science Worker of Russia, Anatoly Altshtein, in conversation with Ura.ru revealed the scheme for full protection from the coronavirus infection.
According to him, this can be achieved by means of an injection and the use of a nasal vaccine.
When used intranasally, a large amount of IgA is produced. This does not happen when the vaccine is given by injection.
The IgA immunoglobulins protect the mucous membranes, so the virus cannot enter the body.
And inside, after vaccination, we produce the most immunoglobulin G (antibodies).
And if you use both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and G immunoglobulins. But there is no decision on double vaccination yet," the medic explained.
The chief sanitarian of the Ural Federal District, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of the use of nasal vaccination along with injection vaccination is the ability to stop being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this will help, as in such a case, the body's defence is supposedly at its maximum.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of the Nizhny Novgorod Region, David Melik-Guseinov, stated that the spread of a new coronavirus infection among children would lead to a new outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic.
According to him, this is exactly what is happening in other countries where the next wave of the pandemic came earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I spoke to the male dog (who died a long time ago) like this - if you are ready to exchange a warm home, food, affection, love and games for a wet cunt, then go ahead.
But the pezel was trained and generally a smart guy.
I chose my company and went home.
The video shows a method that works 90% of the time.
Don’t take my word for it.
I stopped many owners from running after the dog, even though they said, "Look, 200,000 are running away" (pomsky), I took them by the hand and led them away in another direction.
In the end, the “200,000” chose the owner, and not the dog, which was running around there somewhere.
Mass anti-vaccination protests continue in Europe
More than forty thousand protesters took to the streets of the Austrian capital, Vienna.
They expressed discontent with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 mandatory.
From February next year, unvaccinated people will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
Spaniards, outraged by the government's health policy, held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held signs reading "This is a fake pandemic" and "I will not be vaccinated."
A major protest against sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, the Covid certificate is required for access to bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes and night-time entertainment venues.
The decision to introduce sanitary passports was taken by the authorities of a number of regions of the country against the backdrop of an increase in the number of cases of infection with the coronavirus.
In Luxembourg, more than a thousand demonstrators protested against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes.
The action started peacefully, but then escalated into clashes with the police.
A group of protesters began throwing stones at the police.
In response, the law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S., even in Wikipedia there is no consensus on this matter.
Kashevarova-Rudneva is also identified as "the first Russian physician, doctor of medicine," probably because she began her studies earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve the title.
The only thing I agree with Zakharova on is that the Americans only brought death and plunder to every country they appeared in.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical mattress made from natural coconut coir on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The mattress is based on a block of independent TFK springs.
The independent springs ensure proper load distribution, helping the body to take its natural shape.
The natural coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic, and has excellent ventilation.
The natural Jacquard case is thick, wear-resistant, and pleasant to the touch.
It is bad and sad to grow old alone, but it is inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad when you read about it.
A person should live until he can take care of himself and not be a burden to anyone.
Best of health to you all.
The WHO has detected “omicron” in dozens of countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) announced that the new strain of coronavirus "omicron" has already been identified in 63 countries.
A number of experts are already warning that the spread of the new variant could have catastrophic consequences.
The pace of the strain's spread was described in a message from the World Health Organization.
According to the organization, as of December 9, the strain has already been detected in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it has only begun to spread actively since the end of November.
WHO is also concerned about the rapid spread of the new coronavirus variant.
WHO experts express concern that the new strain, according to preliminary data, could be more widespread than the "delta" strain, also known as the Indian variant of COVID-19, which is currently leading in all countries, without exception.
Prior to this, the Director-General of the World Health Organization, Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, stated that the omicron variant is capable of having a significant impact on the course of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The UK also reached a similar conclusion.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will displace "delta" in the coming months.
And the number of those infected in Britain alone will be about 1 million. This is despite the fact that officially, "omicron" is currently infecting several hundred people in the Kingdom, and according to estimates, up to 10,000.
British experts are forecasting tens of thousands of deaths from the “omicron” strain, and at the peak more than 2,000 people will be admitted to hospitals daily.
Which the British healthcare system will not be able to cope with.
The situation is complicated by the fact that according to recent studies the effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower in comparison with other types of the disease.
It is unknown how the Russian Sputnik V will respond to “omicron” – this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has only just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the ‘omicron’ strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of aging?
It would be better to see your exercises in more detail.
It is unclear in the first exercise how to do it: sitting on your heels or standing on your knees, as it is written, but then how can you press your hands on your hips?
Or hands on hips?
Curious Squirrel, you are right, communication on the Internet is completely different, it is easy and relaxed, and in person there is nothing to say.
And to see a person in real life, maybe it’s not what you expected, it didn’t hit you - and that’s where the attitude comes from.
When she meets her man, then her views will change.
And once again, the Soviet period is referred to as “the time of devils”.
Then people believed in God much more honestly than today.
And they were raised practically according to God's laws (love your neighbour, don't steal, etc.).
What is the ideology today? Money at any price.
Globa's the kind of chatterbox who has little (if any) faith, but even if so, the time of the devil came in the 90s...
Our St. Petersburg, or more precisely, Leningrad, communal apartment on Bolshaya Zelenina is still in touch.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we are trying to maintain a warm relationship between the older generation.
Perhaps this is due to the fact that there were no visitors in the apartment, the rooms were not rented out, and the blockade brotherhood was not cancelled by anyone.
Unfortunately, we see each other more often at funerals.
Lara Angelskaya, give it up!
Human babies, especially males, are strong, active, energetic, run around, push, wrestle, fight, just like their little "relatives" in the wild!
Too bad they're not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, lumps, and scratches are common, and no boomerang!
And why should they?
Did the brother push you, miscalculating his strength?
And you've always been so clever that you've never accidentally hurt anyone or injured yourself?
The SkySleep Wave Space BS 150x185 cm mattress.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) spring mattress has medium firmness on both sides.
The comfortable layers of the mattress - a combination of coconut fibre and artificial latex with a relief surface - ErgoFoam.
The case is made of cotton, from a jacquard weave fabric.
It is strong, wear-resistant, and at the same time, it allows air to pass through well without interfering with the mattress ventilation.
The cover is quilted with polyester, which gives it softness.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
Coconut coir has antimicrobial properties, it is hard, and it evenly distributes the weight placed on it.
The artificial latex with a cell-cut surface provides the mattress with a micro-massage effect.
Durable materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnell block, in which the springs are connected to each other, is characterised by reliability, it withstands large loads, and is well-suited for couples with a small difference in weight.
The perimeter of the product is reinforced with a polyurethane box - it extends the life of the mattress and protects the springs from deformation along the edges.
Israeli Prime Minister Bennett announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Ministry of Health on Sunday began an emergency program to increase vaccinations.
From the morning of 12 December, vaccination against coronavirus is taking place in schools throughout Israel.
Prime Minister of the Jewish state Naftali Bennett announced at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose for citizens at risk will also be examined.
In Israel, mass vaccination against the COVID-19 coronavirus infection began on December 20, 2020.
The Pfizer vaccine is being given to Israelis.
From 10 January last year, those who had been vaccinated started to receive the second dose.
Vaccination of 12-15 year-olds in this country began in early June this year.
Currently, more than 5.78 million people have received two doses of the vaccine, and more than 4.12 million citizens have received the third dose.
Anna Gauer, well, probably the tick won't crawl into the trap, it's a SCORPION-LIKE, as LYLIA put it.
In any case, I don't see any ticks.
But I'm curious, what if there is?
We need to give him something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius children's mattress 70x190
A children's two-sided mattress made of natural latex and natural coconut coir on an independent EVS500 spring block.
Children's pocket sprung latex and coir mattress.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties that make sleep as comfortable as possible.
The other side of the mattress is medium-firm, comfortable, made from natural coconut fiber and latex.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
Springs distribute the load as accurately and evenly as possible across the surface of the mattress, supporting the body in its natural position.
It's a great option for schoolchildren and adolescents.
The case is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant, and does not wear out.
Seven people were killed in Brazil as a result of rains
At least seven people died and 175 were injured as a result of heavy rains that hit the northeastern Brazilian state of Bahia and neighboring Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS, citing the emergency services.
Since mid-week, a subtropical cyclone has been raging on the border of these states, causing precipitation in the region to reach 450 mm. A state of emergency has been declared in 25 municipalities in the state of Bahia, and in some of them, the floods have been the most destructive in 35 years.
Several bridges, two river dams, and three roads have been destroyed by the elements.
According to the rescuers, about 5,700 people were left without housing, and another 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage caused by the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know the Levomekol ointment, I work with medicines.
It's a good anti-inflammatory.
Personally, I prefer Bepanthen for the regeneration of surface wounds and scrapes, but it's up to you to decide which is more effective.
The main thing is that the healing process is underway, it was such a hole, just horrible.
Hello, Spain, you didn't hear or understand me.
I will answer with the lines of M. Isakovsky: "Migratory birds fly\nLooking for the past summer.
They fly to the hot countries,\nBut I don't want to fly away,\nI will stay with you,\nMy native side!\n
I don't need another man's sun,\nI don't need another man's land."
Believe me, photos from the ski park or my hometown will be just as good.
It would be much more interesting, by the way, to see your wonderful house and its interiors.
MAPED (France) wax crayons Color'peps Twist, 12 colors, twistable, in a plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax crayons in a plastic case with a twist-up core.
They don't crumble, don't dirty your hands, and are absolutely safe.
They do not require sharpening.
The case is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-use packaging: zip-lock bag.
$135 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, user spending in apps increased by 25% worldwide, while the number of downloads increased by 8%.
The most popular services in the world turned out to be various video services.
Most users downloaded the video editor CapCut, and spent the most on YouTube.
And both the number of app downloads and user spending in them showed significant growth during the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. User spending in apps increased even more significantly, by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
Such data was published by the analytics company App Annie, which presented a report on the mobile app market in 2021.
In 2021, the global economy came out of lockdown and started the post-pandemic recovery.
“Will such a ‘return to the physical’ slow down the growth of the app economy? Not at all”, the authors of the report believe.
India is the leader in terms of the number of app downloads: it accounts for about 20% of all downloads.
Following it are the United States (9%) and Brazil (8%).
iOS device users spent more than Android users, as they always have: iOS accounted for 65% of all app spending.
Among the applications, the first place in the number of downloads in 2021 was taken by the video editor CapCut.
It is followed by two Indian apps: video service MX TakaTak and online commerce app Meesho.
Telegram is also in the top 10 for the number of downloads.
Overall, if we judge by the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (there are two of them in the top 10 - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN), and services related to video creation and streaming (in addition to CapCut and MX TakaTak, two more such services are in the top 10 - Moj and SnackVideo).
“Users spent the most on live streaming and online streaming apps”, the report’s authors note.
YouTube is in the lead here, and in the top five in terms of user spending are also the video service TikTok, streaming video services Disney+ and HBO Max, as well as the Japanese manga subscription service Piccoma.
The first places in terms of the number of monthly active users are taken by Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok, with the mobile version of Microsoft Office in fifth place.
In Russia, the shopping application AliExpress turned out to be the leader in the number of downloads per year.
It is followed by the Zenly service, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
The top 10 apps also include: online karaoke app StarMaker, online clothing retailer Shein, Maps for Minecraft PE, online taxi service DiDi, YouTube client Pure Tuber, Dixy retail app, and Samokat online store.
People around the world have adapted to the pandemic by moving to a mobile life, which can be called one of the main conclusions.
The most successful industries have been those that have helped people be closer, both virtually and in-person," said Lexi Sydow, Head of Marketing Intelligence at App Annie, commenting on the results of the report.
Revenue in the mobile gaming sector reached $90 billion in 2021. The leaders in the number of downloads were casual and hyper-casual games, in which there is no or almost no plot, and the video design is minimal.
Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race have made it into the top three most popular games in the world.
In Russia, DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls and Phone Case DIY are in the lead.
Earlier, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends for the coming year, the company's analysts named the growth in the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the growth in popularity among Generation Z of financial applications, for example, the investor application Robinhood, as well as the continued increase in the popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog treat with beef, 30 pieces at 40 g.
A natural air-dried treat for dogs of all sizes and ages made from beef.
Clan De File is a meaty filet for dogs made of beef, and nothing more.
A natural dried treat for dogs of all breeds and ages.
Only one kind of protein is used in its preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of developing a food allergy, making the treat perfect for dogs with sensitive tummies and those prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the treat is a meat fillet, processed in accordance with quality standards that are used when preparing food for people - human grade.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of an adult animal's daily ration.
Calories: 407.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Food value: protein - 57, fat - 17, ash - 4, moisture - 20.
Russians Warned of New Scam Scheme
The crooks have begun to look for new ways to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this, citing experts.
According to Ivideon's director of products, Zaur Abutalimov, the main danger associated with the use of video communication tools is deepfakes.
In this case, the fraudsters create a fake video based on real recordings with the participation of the victim.
Thanks to this, the neural network is able to accurately reproduce the features of the behaviour of a particular person.
Abutalibov added that using the deepfake, the attacker can make a video call to a friend of the victim or create a video with a copy of a person to send for the purpose of blackmail.
"Such forgeries could easily provoke bullying, since a skilled perpetrator could place people in embarrassing, dangerous or compromising fake scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis lead systems engineer Alexander Westkull, in turn, noted that people tend to trust others more when they see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the case of video-based technologies.
David, I'll add.
In what I wrote above, I focused on the fact that I bought all of this in a small town, where the local mentality didn’t allow me to wear a lot of makeup and walk around in short skirts, show my stockings and pantyhose on my legs.
It's a province, but the store USED to carry that item.
In big cities, Muslim women were wearing makeup and showing their legs.
The same goes for Dushanbe, which is a large city and the capital of the republic.
There are a lot of fashionistas, but there's no same cosmetics.
Five actions to avoid diabetes are listed
Blood sugar problems are some of the most common in the world.
However, some people don't pay much attention to it, and they're wrong to do so.
Diabetes can lead to serious complications and even death over time.
Prophylactic measures play a primary role in preventing the formation of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the drinking regime – reducing the number of different drinks and switching to plain water has a positive effect on metabolism.
Sweet foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when consumed in excess.
Therefore, the first step on the way to a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and keep them at home.
The appearance of the disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
In order to reduce the risks of diabetes, it is necessary to move around a lot.
Experts recommend following a low-carbohydrate diet.
Such a diet not only helps to lose weight, but also protects against sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
To prevent diabetes, you need to eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fibre fills the stomach and thus promotes the feeling of satiety, the release of digestive juices, and the absorption of food.
Tomato seeds Gavrish Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, item number 4241014.
A dwarf early beef-type tomato with heavy cropping for growing in the open and under temporary polythene cover.
The plant is determinate with short internodes.
The fruit is large, of a rich pink colour, quite dense, weighing 180-210 g, protected from sunburn by the leaves, and stores well.
The flesh is juicy, with a sweet taste.
The hybrid is resistant to a complex of diseases.
It is recommended for making salads, snacks, and slices.
Sowing for seedlings: at the end of March - beginning of April.
Harvesting is at the stage of the first true leaf.
The seedlings are planted in greenhouses in May.
After planting in the open ground, plants are shaped and tied up.
MK SLAVDA FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency class, which allows it to consume noticeably less electricity when in operation.
The freezer is ideal for both a private home and an apartment, thanks to the use of high-quality low-noise compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera is no louder than a regular refrigerator.
The quick freeze function freezes products in the shortest possible time, preserving the maximum amount of useful substances.
The Slavda FC-160 ice-cream cabinet meets the N/ST climate class, which means that it can operate without problems at room temperatures up to +38 degrees.
Digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Doctor Pavlov spoke about ‘weekend migraine’ in workaholics
There are several factors that may lead to a deterioration in health over the weekend
The reason for a deterioration in health after working days is often a “weekend migraine”, the well-known endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior research associate at the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine at Moscow State University, and head of the Systemic Medicine Clinic Zukhra Pavlova told in her Telegram channel.
According to her, in particular, workaholics often suffer from this, who experience headaches, fatigue and weakness on the weekends.
Dr. Pavlova noted that, in addition to the fatigue accumulated over the week, there are many objective reasons for the body's negative reaction to a change in conditions.
At the weekend, our lives change radically.
"We sleep for a long time, lie on the sofa all day, probably eat more, and drink less," the doctor argued. "Because of the lack of coffee, there is a small withdrawal.
Overeating and lack of water are causing heaviness and fatigue."
The late start also plays a role.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction known as jet lag.
It occurs in travelers who cross several time zones.
In order to determine which of the factors is playing a decisive role in the deterioration of her well-being, Pavlova recommended tracking what changes the most on the weekends.
Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130х185 mattress.
The reinforced high-density foam perimeter significantly increases the lifespan of the mattress.
The “Optimal Hard S1000” mattress has different firmness sides, and the total height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum permitted load for one sleeping place is 140 kg.
The mattress is based on an independent S1000 spring block (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is in a separate fabric pocket, allowing the body's weight to be distributed properly.
For additional protection, a layer of felt has been added to the spring block, which separates the mattress filling from the springs.
On one side of the mattress there is a 2 cm thick layer of coconut coir, which adds additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
Cotton Jacquard, tufted in 2cm synthetic latex and Hollcon 1cm, which provides additional comfort.
The other side of the mattress has a 1 cm thick layer of coconut coir and a layer of felt has been used.
The fabric is treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Sweden) impregnation.
The impregnation ensures the complete destruction of mold, does not allow the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for flipping it over, as well as ventilators for additional ventilation of the layers.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine ineffective against 'omicron'
South Africa says Pfizer vaccine ineffective against "omicron"
South African researchers conducted a study and reported low effectiveness of the Pfizer vaccine against the omicron strain of COVID-19.
It (the level of "omicron" neutralization) is estimated to correspond to (the level of) vaccine effectiveness at 22.5% against symptomatic infection, which... calls into question the ability of the vaccine to protect against infection, according to the study published on the MedRxiv portal.
At the same time, experts clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron variant of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in the United Kingdom with more frequent hospitalizations than a year ago.
How much hidden sugar is in common foods?
Sugar is not the best source of beneficial nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes, as well as causing cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that an unfamiliar ingredient in a product may be a hidden sugar - an ingredient similar to sugar in calories, composition, and glycemic index.
There could be dozens of names listed on the label, all essentially meaning sugar.
Some of the most common and frequently encountered names are glucose and fructose.
There can also be other sugars like dextrose (sugar from corn), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (black treacle), agave syrup and so on.
These are all the simple carbs that fall into monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can not only be in sweets, but also in ketchup, hot dogs, bread, and so on.
According to Rospotrebnazor, the most effective way to reduce sugar consumption is to eat whole and unprocessed foods, and to pay attention to the label and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar vary in flavor, but regardless of what the ingredient is called in a product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it's still sugar.
Calculating the exact amount of sugar is not easy as it is not just the amount of sugar listed by the manufacturer on the package that must be considered, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits, and so on originally contain a certain amount of sugar.
Therefore, the total amount of sugar can be much higher than stated on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for Germany within 25 years
Germany's new chancellor, Olaf Scholz, has said that gas imports are losing importance for Germany, as the country continues its transition to a decarbonized economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
"That is to say, after 25 years, the world will be such that the question of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," said the chancellor.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to remain committed to the fact that Ukraine will transport Russian natural gas in the future, as this resource is currently important for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States made a statement in which Berlin’s support for Ukraine’s energy transformation was recorded.
Earlier, German Foreign Minister Annalena Baerbock stated that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 pipeline continues.
According to the minister, it was stated during the coalition negotiations and the discussion of the coalition agreement that European energy law should be applied to energy projects.
The diplomat also pointed out that the pipeline "does not yet meet the requirements" of the European Union.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
Back in 1985, I had to go to those parts.
I remember the CMEZ going up the hill from the Kanatchkovo station, past an old building (resembling a signalling post, two-storey), along Kanatchkovo Proezd, and turning right onto Vavilova Street, to the factory gates...
Hackers breach India PM's Twitter account
Hackers have broken into the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The perpetrators managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India supposedly recognized Bitcoin as a legal means of payment, and that the country has already purchased the cryptocurrency.
At Modi's office, they asked me to ignore the new messages.
Representatives of the prime minister stated that Twitter reacted quickly - access to the account was restored.
The page of the Prime Minister of India was already hacked in 2020 and asked for donations to the fund using cryptocurrency.
In a referendum in New Caledonia, the majority voted against independence
In New Caledonia, the third referendum, held on 12 December, ended with the same result as the two previous ones.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, the majority of New Caledonians voted during the referendum against the independence of their territory.
At the same time, the level of participation in this third vote has become significantly lower than in the previous two.
According to preliminary results, published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755 people) voted in favor of New Caledonia's independence from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted "no".
The turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 residents of New Caledonia taking part in the election.
As Agence France-Presse commented on these preliminary results, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as the independence supporters called on the voters not to participate in the vote.
As the initiators of the referendum, they came out against its holding on 12 December, considering that a new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago was preventing the holding of a full and "honest" election campaign.
Thus, this abstention opened the way to a third victory for the pro-French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and in October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of residents voted against independence, in 2020 - 53.3%.
The separatists said they do not recognize the results of the latest vote and will challenge them at the United Nations.
On Sunday, December 12, the Elysee Palace reported that French President Emmanuel Macron was to speak on the results of this referendum.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has dominated the final weeks of the French presidential campaign.
Several presidential candidates have spoken in favour of the territory remaining part of France, as it is "the last region of the European Union's presence in the Pacific".
“New Caledonia must remain French at all costs,” Eric Zemmour said repeatedly.
The same statement was made by Republican candidate Valérie Pécresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October calling on the Caledonians to remain French.
For his part, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position "because it is not his responsibility".
Nevertheless, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed a "strong desire that the choice of the Caledonians be the choice of France".
Sveta, oh, hello!
I was a little... a bit rude to you, I'm still feeling awkward, I'm ashamed.
Thank you for not turning away from my channel.
On the subject: I am not an artist, I love to draw, but it turns out to be an inspired scrawl.
But as an artist - not an artist at all: what would you change here?
Just don't forget that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as widespread as it is now.
As for medicine, it was zero - leeches, garlic, and infusions.
These days, they would have got him back on his feet in no time.
And the food has nothing to do with it.
Turkey tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon
Turkey successfully tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon.
The "Eren" drone was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 meters, MIR24 reports.
The device is capable of neutralising explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The maximum flight altitude of the new model reaches 3,000 m.
After passing the necessary tests, the drone will enter service with the Turkish military, which will use it to destroy explosive devices without the involvement of sappers.
The agency emphasizes that Turkey is one of six countries in the world able to develop and produce its own drones.
I cut the hunchback into steaks.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and allspice.
Sometimes I added cloves, it didn't hurt.
Into a deep bowl, I covered it with a plate.
Well, that's pretty much it.
And what do I need this salmon for, for such money, it's unknown what kind of salmon, excellent salmon is a great fish.
Bread, butter, salmon.
Awesome sandwich.
WSJ readers criticise article on Russia-US relations
Readers of The Wall Street Journal have criticized an article by Professor Christopher Hartwell in which he described his vision of the relationship between Russia and the United States.
The author of the material expressed concern that the West is supposedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinced readers of the danger emanating from Moscow, and made a number of insulting remarks against Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end, Hartwell called on Western countries to "stand as one against Russia."
Readers of the WSJ expressed their disagreement with the American professor's position.
“There is a lot of false information in this article”, RIA Novosti quotes one of the readers as saying.
"Europe is not ours to "lose", and Ukraine is not our land.
The U.S. and NATO allies will never go to nuclear war with Russia over Ukraine," another noted.
Patches can also be applied to the lip area.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch, used in the production of the eye patch, is a high-tech polymer that provides high absorption and delivery of highly concentrated natural plant essence to the skin, closely adheres to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When delivering nutrients to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the associated moisture loss and allows the essence to penetrate deep into the layers of the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL Chandelier with Nores remote control
The NORES 2085/EL lamp consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is a high-quality white matt acrylic, which provides even diffusion and good light transmission for the luminaire.
The shape of the lampshade: square, in the shape of a relief pattern with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent dots, giving the lit lamp a beautiful effect of "star twinkling" and play of light.
The IP43 protection rating allows the luminaire to be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, with a power of 72 watts, which corresponds to a 520-watt incandescent lamp.
It also comes with a remote control, which allows you to smoothly change the colour temperature from 3000-6000K, change the brightness, and switch between the warm/white/cold/night light modes.
Uriage Face Mask, Hydrating Thermal Night, 50ml.
The ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with the effect of fresh, rested and shining skin in the morning!
A real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It tones, smooths the skin's relief and restores the skin barrier.
It has a very pleasant water-gel texture without stickiness.
An excellent skin care product after exposure to the sun!
Hypoallergenic.
A 5.2 magnitude earthquake occurred in the Kuril Islands region
A magnitude 5.2 earthquake occurred near the Kuril island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was 231.8 km northeast of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The focus was at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded a 7.5-magnitude earthquake in Peru, during which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make something of himself, his petty-bourgeois thinking would probably have led him nowhere.
It's good when you arrive in America as a known person.
But if you were born there, you wouldn't know what to fight for.
So it was pointless for him to smear the construction with mud, bile, and poison. No one has yet come up with a more just construction.
Ukraine will begin to produce new generation jet drones
The new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will start to create unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) of the ANKA type.
This was reported on December 11 by the non-staff adviser to the head of the office of the Ukrainian president, Aleksey Arestovich.
In other words, they are able to act against air targets, against other UAVs.
Even against piloted aircraft.
They will have Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the hull, and so on," Dialog.ua quotes him as saying.
Commenting on the main features of ANKA drones, Arestovich said that they are jet, not piston, drones.
According to him, this is a new generation of drones after the Bayraktar, which surpasses it "in all characteristics".
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the plant at the end of next year, concluded Arestovych.
The ANKA aircraft was created by the Turkish Space Agency in February 2014.
The development of the drone was carried out by the Turkish government in cooperation with a number of private companies since 2010.
The day before, the Ukrainian General Staff classified information on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems in military operations of the Joint Forces in Donbas.
On December 6, the President of Ukraine, Volodymyr Zelensky, reported that construction of a plant for the manufacture of modern military drones had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine intends to use drones.
On September 29, the Bayraktar Savunma company and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement on the construction of a center in the Kyiv region, where personnel will be trained, as well as tests and maintenance of the Turkish UAV Bayraktar will be carried out.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader's office called this memorandum "a big real step forward".
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions have escaped at Singapore's Changi Airport.
This is reported by The Straits Times.
Two of the predators managed to get out of the container with seven lions, which arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it remains unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions lay down on the roof of a shipping container.
The animals could not get away from it because of the protective screen that was installed nearby.
The stand-off ended after staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which operates all of Singapore's zoos, arrived at the airport.
They've immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and are planning to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier it was reported that in Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia, a lion escaped from its owner and walked the streets of the city.
On the same day, the animal voluntarily returned home, and no people were injured.
Experts warn of cancer risk from B9 vitamin
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, can lead to cancer.
The Daily Express warned about this.
According to the experts, there is strong evidence that people who do not have a lack of folic acid are less likely to get certain types of cancer, in particular, colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the necessary dose, on the contrary, promotes the growth of cancer cells.
Professor of Nutrition at the University of Alabama at Birmingham, Beth Kitchin advises to monitor the amount of folic acid consumed during the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
The risk of cancer is only increased if you significantly deviate from this figure in either direction.
Kitchin recommends not taking B9 tablets without a doctor's advice, keeping a close eye on the dosage and avoiding breakfast cereals with milk and other foods that contain folic acid.
Previously, dietitian Rachel Fine named folic acid a substance that slows aging.
As it is, among other things, contained in avocados, Fein recommended that men over the age of 50 eat this fruit more often.
In the UK, around 75,000 people could die due to the omicron variant by April
British scientists predict that up to 75,000 people could die in England in the next five months as a result of the spread of the omicron strain of the coronavirus if restrictions are not tightened in the winter.
This was reported by The Guardian newspaper, citing a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), TASS reports.
According to the most optimistic forecast of the experts who are part of the scientific advisory group for emergencies at the British cabinet, by April 2022 at least 25,000 deaths from the Omicron strain will be recorded in the country, and a total of about 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
At the peak of the epidemic, hospitals will be treating more than 2,000 infected people a day.
'Serious coronavirus control measures may be needed to avoid overwhelming the NHS if the Omicron variant is more transmissible than the Delta variant and current vaccines do not prevent infection,' said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from LSHTM.
Earlier, the UK Health Security Agency reported: if the rate of spread of the omicron strain remains at its current level, then by the end of the year, about 1 million cases of infection will be identified in the country.
Meanwhile, by mid-December, the omicron variant could become dominant in the United Kingdom.
There are currently 1,898 cases of the Omicron variant of coronavirus in the UK, of which 633 have been identified in the past 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health Sajid Javid pointed out that in reality this figure could already be as high as 10,000 cases.
I wanted to make a smart comment, but I read up to this point:
"A fur coat received as a result of the incredible suffering of a poor animal and its employment in a second job".
And it fell under the table!
It turns out that the “unfortunate animal” is a husband, and I thought it was a chinchilla!
The last knight on this planet.
Judging by the dislikes, Richard Gray, you express your thoughts in a way that is not very accessible to the majority.
What did you mean - that those who post on Instagram are either pretending or they really do manage to do everything, since they have no reason to pretend?
The SS is similar to a clearance sale, everything that didn't sell at the time ends up here.
If you set a goal and dig deep enough, you can find something worth keeping in the junk.
You just have to be patient and have a clear idea of what you're looking for.
Demand for superyachts has grown by a quarter in the world
This year's super-yacht building and next year's orders are breaking all records, despite calls to reduce the carbon footprint and combat climate change.
The number of ordered yachts in the world register of ships is 1200 units, which is a quarter more than last year.
In an era of climate change mitigation, it is hard to imagine that the number of people who have the will and the money for a £50m-plus floating fortress will not decline, the Guardian writes.
But there are more and more of them.
This year 25% more ships have been ordered than last year.
Brokers say they haven't seen such a frenzy in the market for 20 years.
The first reason is that many of those who can afford a yacht are fearful of getting infected on land and prefer to hide from the pandemic on board their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
If earlier all these people went to the office and met with business partners in person, now the absolute majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted via Zoom.
Broker Will Christie told the newspaper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts for 2025 and beyond.
This means that clients are willing to pay more just to have their yacht ready one or two years earlier.
"People just want to be free, and the super-rich could afford it," he says.
In Western society, many criticise such behaviour in the rich and call it decadent.
The rich, say sociologists, do not want to understand that in the time of deprivations, travel to space, life on yachts or flights on their own planes cause irritation in society, since the elite does not want to share responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are calling on governments to act and propose new taxes and rules for the super-rich, though they acknowledge it will be extremely difficult given the mobility of money.
However, it is only the number of super-yachts ordered that is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1,200 ships, 27 have a stern length of more than 100 meters.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the REV Ocean yacht, which is 183 meters long.
When launched, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht includes a “moon pool”, as well as a submarine for exploring the depths of the sea.
Helipads, open-air movie theaters and, in some cases, like the yacht of boxer McGregor, a platform for mixed martial arts have become commonplace on superyachts. Professor of economic anthropology at Indiana University Richard Wilk says that compared with the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions, the carbon footprint produced by the super-rich is insignificant.
But it has a symbolic meaning, considering that there are just over 2,000 billionaires in the world.
It is just another example of the super-consumption of a very small group of people.
Researchers have found that the emissions footprint of billionaires is thousands of times larger than that of the average citizen of the planet.
If one person emits an average of 5 tons of CO2 per year, the biggest polluter on the planet, Roman Abramovich, is responsible for 33.9 tons of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018.
At the same time, two-thirds of the emission footprint came from his 162.5-meter yacht Eclipse.
Even if the owner is not on board the yacht, the crew continues to pollute the planet.
The owner can call the captain and tell him to bring the yacht, say, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
Superyacht owners do not inspire sympathy in others when they, like Australia's richest woman Gina Rinehart, who owns mines on the continent, complain via YouTube that there is no room for their giant vessels to dock.
It is also difficult to understand her call to build marinas for ships with a length of 50 metres.
Dangerous weekly alcohol dose found to cause bowel cancer
American scientists have determined the amount of alcoholic beverages in a week that increases the risk of developing cancer.
The Daily Express reports on this.
Experts have concluded that drinking four or more units of alcohol per week is linked to an increased risk of developing cancer.
At the same time, the risk of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
What's more, the risk of bowel cancer is higher in men who drink moderately than in women.
The exact cause of this type of cancer has not been determined by scientists, although they note that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thanks to the author for the worthy material and photos.
Sergei, I see nothing wrong with egotism and pride.
Just as you do not see the selfishness and pride in the man who is looking for a free surrogate mother in order to burden her with costs and responsibilities, while he can enjoy the title of a father from a safe distance.
Why are they working in the ministry? They should be in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been on a royal scale, but the model is very exaggerated.
It's hard to imagine the poor Diana being squeezed into a carriage, and the movement in general.
I was 12 and I remember watching the ceremony on TV.
It would seem that almost every girl dreams of being a princess in a beautiful ball gown, and I am no exception.
But looking at such a dress, I changed my mind about being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, and in fact all, dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they have no idea how sophisticated these four-legged pets really are.
Over the years, biologists have conducted various experiments to find out for sure how intelligent animals are.
Although a dog's vocabulary is not as broad as a human's, a new study has proved that a dog can consistently respond to 89 words or phrases.
The scientists' findings were published in Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they don't know anything about politics, economics and art, but they often manage to fool their owners.
Representatives of some breeds, experts say, show the best results in understanding human language, but there are not enough statistics for accurate conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered to be dog geniuses, such as Labradors.
Scientists have concluded that dogs are capable of logical thinking, and in terms of learning ability, they are not inferior to a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
Mattress on a TFK independent spring block with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made from an independent TFK block.
This is a reliable modern construction with 512 independent springs per sleeping place.
Each spring is in a separate bag and has no effect on neighboring ones.
Thus, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
A person assumes his or her natural shape while sleeping.
Springs are isolated from the top layers for strength with a layer of aluminized mylar.
On top of the felt are layers of natural latex and coconut, which have excellent and beautiful properties.
One side is enhanced with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 comfort zones, promotes the perception of a person's weight, and has a slight massaging effect.
The Antistress cover is made from velvet, quilted with 250 g of holofiber per square meter.
It feels and looks nice, has calming and relaxing properties.
Sova, a bright example is the deep-sea angler fish of Taumatikhth Aksel.
Some of his victims are so large that they cause the digger's death.
It simply can't swallow them, and its teeth won't allow it to spit the prey back into the water.
If you do not care about the fate of your property in the amount of four objects, then why did you decide that your objects are of interest to someone and that he will care for them?
Today, the law allows you to manage your property.
Do it yourself if you don't like the way others are doing it.
Ukraine is preparing for a trade war between the United States and Russia
The United States and Russia will “bargain” over Ukraine’s entry into NATO, analyst Alexander Kochetkov wrote in an article for Glavred.
In his opinion, Washington and Moscow plan to continue negotiations on U.S. guarantees that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance in the near future, despite the words of U.S. leader Joe Biden about the right of countries "to join anywhere".
If you're offered something obviously unacceptable, such as selling a close relative into sexual slavery, you won't haggle, you'll just tell the offerer to get lost.
As for Ukraine, a bargain is in the offing", the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia has no plans to attack Ukraine and is striving for dialogue with Kiev.
"Training is conducted covertly, quickly and they immediately move to offensive actions, and do not wait for the group to be discovered and countermeasures to be deployed," he noted.
China Stimulates the Development of the Railway Industry
Advanced Chinese technologies have attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Expo held in Zhuzhou City, Hunan Province/Central China/.
The core technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. allow trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, noted company representative Hou Zhaowei.
The high-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, which will ensure greater reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
Over the past six months, China has significantly increased the export of rail vehicles, and many countries in Asia and Europe are witnessing the "Chinese speed".
In May this year, the first double-deck high-speed EMU designed in China rolled off the production line of CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd, which was designed for export to Europe.
With a top operating speed of 200 km/h, these trains will run on the railways of Austria, Germany, Hungary and other European countries.
In November, a metro train developed by the above-mentioned company for Turkey was put into trial operation.
The train will travel along a metro line connecting the center of Istanbul with the city's airport.
Service on the line will open next year.
This will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometers per hour.
"China's railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Feng Yaoxian, head of the trade and investment department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
"This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese high-end equipment on the world market," said Fan Yaoshan.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created a leading railway equipment manufacturing system, with a complete set of supporting facilities and large-scale production activities.
According to Feng Yaxian, the country ranks first in the level of electrification of railways and the operational mileage of high-speed and urban railways.
The biologist listed the early signs of dementia
The Candidate of Biological Sciences, Semen Golosheykin, listed the early signs of dementia in an interview with Sputnik radio.
According to him, forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of moderate cognitive disorders, such as inability to concentrate, plan, and reduced level of abstract thinking, can be signs of future dementia.
There is currently a debate as to whether hearing loss can be both an early symptom of Alzheimer's disease and a risk factor for developing it, the expert said.
Golosheykin emphasized that the causes of dementia can include neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, certain infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and atherosclerosis of the blood vessels of the brain are the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that to date, doctors do not know of effective treatments for dementia.
That is why it is necessary to start its prevention in a timely manner.
According to him, studying foreign languages and engaging in active communication will help reduce the risk of developing dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regularly exercising cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intense engagement of memory and logical thinking.
“There are recommendations for the use of various dietary supplements, however, their effectiveness and usefulness are still being discussed in the scientific community”, Golosheykin said.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities through games and hobbies that require intense involvement of memory and logical thinking", said Goloshaikin.
Earlier this year, a UK dementia research charity said the disease was increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
Doctors have named the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be problems with vision, due to which the patient acquires difficulties in recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia, experts say, is aphasia, a condition in which a person can't find the right words to convey what he or she wants to say.
The neurologist demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
Former Georgian President Mikheil Saakashvili needs psychoneurological treatment and rehabilitation abroad, neurologist Otar Toidze told journalists, who is part of a group of doctors created by the Georgian ombudsman.
His [Saakashvili's] neurological status is leading in his illness.
Stable problems are problems with mobility, coordination, and mood swings," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm, and now the former president needs to be sent for specialized rehabilitation.
"We call this neurorehabilitation and psycho-neurorehabilitation, a possibility which we did not find in Georgia," Toidze noted, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a specialized institution, which does not exist in Georgia.
In the evening of December 7, Saakashvili began sabotaging the provision of medical assistance after he was subjected to disciplinary punishment by the penitentiary service officers.
The Georgian politician managed to have the punishment overturned and his rights restored quickly.
Alexander, "Do you also take money for this?" - I'm interested to know where people like this come from...
It’s normal to pay for bread in a bakery, but not for the work of a tutor?
Or are we so holy that we feed on prana?
There's another side to the medal, though.
These people are parasites on the body of society.
They don't work, they don't pay taxes, they live off benefits and their relatives.
At the same time, they receive full medical care.
How many mouths can a job feed?
We are feeding all of the drunks, the drug addicts who have also lost their health because of their stupidity.
Then we're surprised by the extension of the retirement age.
That money could be spent on treating people who are actually sick.
Undoubtedly, the Victory Banner will forever remain in the history of our country, and it should not be confused with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side and is a symbol of the communist movement, so it can never be a state flag again.
The author should stop writing provocative articles, it's time to make peace with the red and start living a normal life, not living in the past.
Protests against COVID passes held in Spain
In the Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, protests were held against the mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificate, the Europa Press agency reports.
In the capital of Catalonia, the number of participants in the action was approximately 3,000 people.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory to enter bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes and nightclubs.
Many protesters came to the rally without masks.
The slogans on their posters accused the state of totalitarianism and called for respect for the choice of citizens.
In Valencia, vaccination passports will also be required to enter entertainment venues and restaurants with a capacity of more than 50 people.
Protesters in the city have claimed a medical dictatorship, calling the vaccination an experiment.
Since the beginning of the pandemic, more than 5.2 million cases of COVID-19 have been identified in Spain, and more than 88,000 patients have died.
Russia is also planning to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
The government introduced bills on a single QR code system to the State Duma on 12 November.
Russians are expected to be able to visit places of mass gatherings, cultural institutions, food and retail outlets with either a vaccination or recovery certificate, or a medical exemption from vaccination.
The same rules will apply to travel by train and by plane.
Traditions Anthracite 26 cm cast iron grill with a glass lid.
A cast-iron grill with an anti-stick coating, Antracite TM Tradition.
The dishes are intended for daily use in the home.
The exceptional strength and durability of the non-stick coating, equivalent to that of natural stone, has been specially designed for intensive everyday use.
It has a thick-walled cast-iron body.
A five-layer non-stick coating of the latest generation.
Premium coverage, enhanced with mineral particles.
Two layers of additional protection against scorching.
It has good non-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy meals without oil and fat.
No less than 4000 cooking cycles, when operated in accordance with the operating instructions.
Suitable for all types of hobs, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The guarantee for each item is 4 years (provided that the operating rules are followed: 4 years for the body and 1 year for the non-stick coating).
Do not contain PFOA, LEAD, CADMIUM.
Casserole dishes and roasters can be used in the oven without a glass lid.
Ease of cleaning.
By its very nature, the virus is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and gets sick rarely (once or twice a year with a cold), then his immune system is normal.
Immunomodulators are generally not recommended by doctors for prevention.
Immunity is supported by a healthy diet and routine, plus exercise.
Based on this, vaccination against flu and this coronavirus is pointless.
3M 5925 anti-aerosol filter.
FFP2 protection level, 2 pcs.
Part No. 713946.
FFP2 replacement filter for 3M 6000, 3M 7500 half face masks and 3M full face masks.
Provides protection of the user's respiratory tract from various substances in the air.
It creates a reliable barrier to infectious particles.
This filter is designed for use in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the surrounding air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used for bacteria/virus protection along with, for example, essential oils and other antibacterials.
The FFP2 protection class has an APF greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum pollutant concentration of 12 times the TLV.
Respirators of this protection class are capable of retaining at least 94% of harmful substances.
The pre-filters are attached to the respirator filters using the 3M 501 filter holder.
Features: low breathing resistance.
It does not obstruct the view.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half masks, and 3M full face masks.
It is compatible with other PPE required in difficult working conditions.
The wide-eyed "constitutional monarch" has, according to the Internet, gotten to more than just me.
And then this family PR - children, father...
Revva didn't seem to me to be anything special.
All he knew was to harass Zaitsev - Batrukha and Batrukha.
Well, I found out, said once, and be quiet, let the other guy show what he can do, that's what we fought for.
A steep climb: How Chinese are becoming skiers
The Olympics should attract millions of people to the slopes and help create world-class resorts in the country
In China, it is hoped that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to participate in winter sports, which will allow the collection of the 1 trillion yuan designated by President Xi Jinping, but also promote the economic development of backward remote provinces.
The ski resort of Taiwu in Zhangjiakou, located near the site of the Winter Olympic Games, is becoming increasingly popular with the Chinese.
In addition to infrastructure construction in the region, there are also landscaping efforts underway: workers are planting trees.
The country has more than 700 ski resorts, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international-level competitions.
In many regions of China where the resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main long-term goal is to ensure comfortable and interesting holidays at Chinese resorts, so that all newcomers become regulars.
However, it is still a long way off.
Organizing committee advisor Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
More and more Chinese are going to the slopes every winter.
Fiona, a snowboarder from Beijing, is one of them.
Despite the major changes, it will take many more years to create a ski culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions still need to be actively developed, and the necessary infrastructure for recreation needs to be created there.
70-year-old Gao Makong lives in Chongli, not far from the Winter Olympics venue.
He notes that in recent years there has been a boom in winter sports tourism here.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chongli, and now none of the locals are unemployed.
There are more and more shops opening in the country that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
Restaurants serving national dishes are opening on the slopes.
There's even a COVID-19 testing station in Taiwan now.
China is seeking to create a thriving winter sports industry, with its athletes leading the way in major international competitions and its resorts and equipment reaching world-class standards.
More than 500 million people worldwide could be pushed into extreme poverty by the pandemic, WHO says
More than 500 million people worldwide could be pushed into extreme poverty by the coronavirus pandemic, which has stalled human progress toward universal health coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and World Bank (WB) have said.
To mark the International Day of Universal Health Coverage on 12 December, WHO and the World Bank have released two complementary reports.
In them, they stated that the pandemic had led to disruptions in the provision of health services and had caused excessive strain on health systems.
In this regard, for the first time in 10 years, the coverage of the population with immunization has decreased, the death rate from tuberculosis and malaria has increased.
The WHO and the World Bank emphasized that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, making it harder for people to pay for care."
The situation is pushing more than 500 million people "into extreme poverty because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets."
In October, UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres said the coronavirus pandemic has pushed more than 100 million people into poverty, and more than four billion people have little or no social protection.
Makita KP0810 planing machine
An official Makita dealer.
A powerful motor is ideal for creasing.
Light weight and great balance.
Use of both standard and bilateral mini-saws.
A simple quick-change blade system.
The new ergonomic design of the body, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the effect of vibration on the user's hands.
Three V-shaped notches to remove the chamfer of different sizes.
The chip ejection system is selectable: left or right.
A wife is like a meat grinder.
It's disgusting.
They have already gorged themselves on flying mice and pangolins, and now they are turning their attention to jellyfish.
Oh, how many wonderful discoveries the moles, mantids and lemmings may still have in store for us.
Reuters: Taiwan minister cut from 'Summit for Democracy' at White House request
Taiwan’s Minister of Digital Affairs Audrey Tang’s speech at a panel discussion during the U.S.-led “Summit for Democracy” was recorded in a video-free mode, according to a recording of the summit on YouTube.
Reuters agency, citing sources, states that the picture was turned off at the request of the White House.
According to their report, the reason was a map on which Taiwan was highlighted in a different color from the People's Republic of China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map Ms. Tan showed was compiled by the South African nongovernmental organization CIVICUS and ranked countries around the world on how well they protected civil liberties.
Taiwan was marked on it in green as "free," and the People's Republic of China, North Korea, Laos, and Vietnam were marked in red as "closed."
After the secretary showed the map, her picture on the screen was replaced with a screenshot with a note saying that the participants' views "are not necessarily those of the U.S. government."
China was not invited to the "Summit for Democracy".
Reuters sources note that the map shown by the Taiwanese minister could contradict Washington's "One China" policy.
A source told the agency that after the map was displayed, the U.S. National Security Council angrily contacted the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized ‘Summit for Democracy’ was held on December 9-10 with the participation of representatives from 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
During the ‘zero day’ of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate and editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund, through which money obtained via corruption would be given to charity.
Earlier today, the deputy secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yuri Averianov, stated that the summit carried an “anti-Russian and anti-Chinese charge.”
They give you the impression that they're cooking food, and there's rotten meat everywhere, but in fact, the meat remains with the butcher to the very last piece.
A classic of journalism is to create a story out of nothing.
They boil not the meat, but the horns and hoofs, getting a substance like glue.
The finished product looks like a yellow, semi-transparent strip, almost odorless and as hard as plastic, and is used as a natural gelatin.
In fact, there are no fewer harmful substances from the processing of garbage than from its decomposition.
But this saves companies huge amounts of money.
That is why the fairy tale about the environment was invented for the idiots, who will even try to assemble the rubbish for free for the sake of the idea.
Personally, my contribution to the environment is to refrain from buying unnecessary things and to use things for a long time.
If I go beyond the limits, I don't throw them away, but donate them for charity.
Jogel Camp JFS-1120-016 soccer shorts, white/black (XL).
Description: Football shorts are great for playing football and other sports.
The shorts have a straight, comfortable cut.
The wide belt, in combination with the adjustable drawstring, ensures a comfortable fit.
The fabric is characterized by high strength, durability, lightness and good air permeability, meeting the requirements of the game at any level.
The updated brand logo is on the left.
The shorts are packed in a convenient reusable bag with a zip closure.
Stylish appearance, straight cut, wide belt with a drawstring, durable long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Characteristics.
Move into specializations that allow you to work online.
Many of us get by by working for Uncle Sam, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currencies, it is beneficial to us.
Compared to other countries, we're still poor.
Of course, you’ll have to learn different skills, but... working online allows you not to depend on the internal labour market.
Our country creates almost no jobs.
And those who create it, you can’t earn much on them.
Egoist-Unity dining set with gold-plating (4 pieces).
The ‘Royal Childhood’ collection is one of the most extensive and well-known collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It contains a host of charming silver models of spoons, forks and knives, rattles and dummies, feeding bottles and beakers.
All children's silver cutlery is subject to strict quality control.
The eco-silver, which is produced directly in the factory, and the careful hand-polishing with cotton rollers make the products absolutely safe for a child.
Thanks to the disinfecting function of silver, regular use of silver utensils can support the body's natural immunity and even prevent some of the common childhood diseases.
The specialists of the factory received a grant to apply the difficult but very beautiful guilloche technique, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed the creation of amazingly bright and three-dimensional images on products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become a child's loyal friends.
Inka Squirrel, everything will be fine.
There's a second lung.
The lung tissue regenerates well if not all of it is removed; the remaining portion will expand.
If it is a pneumonectomy, however, the remaining lung will become larger over time and will function for two.
Try to breathe deeply yourself, fathers are stronger than daughters, they don't like tears very much.
Don't mourn too soon.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight
Blue Origin's New Shepard spacecraft, with six tourists on board, made a suborbital flight on Saturday, December 11.
The journey, broadcast on the company's website, lasted more than ten minutes in total, after which the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, reports TASS.
The launch of the launch vehicle was carried out from the spaceport in the area of the American city of Van Horn (the state of Texas).
The ship reached an altitude of just over 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The launch vehicle itself landed normally at the launch site.
Blue Origin successfully completed its first suborbital flight of the New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
SKETCHES OF A VILLAGE MOSCOWITE.
Don't lump them all together - bad people exist, and you might have a claim against them for a specific reason...
But what has the number of children, age, pension fund, and other things got to do with it?
They write that they are "scumbags who didn't return the money."
But how many and when to have children is none of your business, as long as they don’t intend to hang these children around your neck.
And since that is ruled out, what right do you have to condemn them?
I guess this is just how it is in education...
The elected parents (of course) dictate their own rules, openly disregarding the existing ones.
And what if it affects other areas of life, the courts, and so on?
They are above the law.
And what if dad does end up implementing his method of upbringing and education?
It's awful, and it's a very bad example for others.
DESIGN WORKS 2719 "Feathered stars" cross-stitch kit.
Kit contents: Aida 14 ct dark blue canvas, stranded cotton, beads, sequins, needle, chart, instructions.
The Design Works production has its beginning in 1987 and is still popular all over the world.
Many of the motifs were worked out by the well-known designer Ronald West.
Design Works cross-stitch kits are complete with quality Aida cloth, 100% cotton floss, and size 24 tapestry needle.
Also in the assortment you will find cross-stitch sets on a plastic canvas, Tobin embroidery is embroidery on napkins, table runners and tablecloths, and much more.
China Intensifies Prevention and Control of COVID-19 Epidemic in Cities with Land Ports
The Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism of the State Council of China has issued a circular to strengthen the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports of entry in order to further prevent the importation of the infection from abroad.
According to the circular, people leaving the designated cities must provide a negative result of a COVID-19 nucleic acid test obtained within 48 hours prior to departure.
Those arriving in cities where there are land checkpoints must take at least one COVID-19 nucleic acid test upon arrival.
The document says that these requirements will take effect from the date when the relevant provincial-level administrative units determine and publish the zones of the aforementioned cities, until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that towns hosting land border points and meeting certain conditions may consider the possibility of creating buffer zones for the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisia Sokolova, as usual, Russian women are drawn to the eastern ethnos by Indian movies, which only in Russia were shown in movie theaters.
In the west, no one looked at this crap with the natives.
And how many such cities and villages forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring Mattress Vivre Castom family, 140х195, item number: 5110704.
The layer composition of the RelaxFoam mattress is as follows: 3 cm aloe latex, 2 cm TFK coconut, 2 cm coconut, 3 cm aloe latex, and 2 cm RelaxFoam.
The case is Splendid knitwear.
The knitted fabric, made from cotton, has a special design.
The base is wrapped with special synthetic threads, which provide the material with special strength and softness.
The cellular structure of the weave supports natural thermoregulation and moisture-wicking while you sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, density 230 g/m2.
Dimask OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The OK Basis spring orthopedic mattress is one of the most affordable models in the range.
The practical Balance Foam filler gives the mattress all the necessary orthopedic properties, but at the same time keeps the price at a budget level.
This item represents an optimal combination of price and quality.
Pena Balance is a modern material that is obtained from PUR.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
This is why foam is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate, obtained in Europe, where the requirements are much more stringent than in Russia.
Another important quality of Balance Foam is its orthopaedic properties: the material supports the correct position of the body throughout the night.
Thanks to the foam, the mattress has a stiffness below the average level, so the product is considered to be quite soft by the manufacturer.
The main load-bearing block in the mattress is the SuperSprings.
It is remarkable for the presence of independent springs, here there are 256 elements per square meter.
The practical block can support a weight of up to 100 kg per sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, intensifying the orthopedic qualities of the foam.
The manufacturer offers the option of choosing between a 12cm or 18cm high spring unit at no extra cost.
Be sure to indicate your preferences to the store operator when placing your order.
The mattress comes in a knitted cover, and together with it the height of the model is 21 cm.
The case is non-removable.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress is CertiPUR certified.
Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG lamp from the manufacturer Arte Lamp.
It is perfect for rooms like the living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
This lighting fixture is available in the following colour: gold.
The lamp uses E14 light bulbs.
The total power allows to illuminate approximately 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this lamp for rooms decorated in a "Classic" style.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs spoke about the "sad outcome" in relations between Russia and the United States
Deputy Head of the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs Sergey Ryabkov, in an interview with Izvestia, assessed the prospects for the relationship between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that a long history of interaction has led to sad conclusions and the problems between the two countries did not begin yesterday.
There is one-sided negative predictability, but as for any prospect of improving relations, it is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion after a long road we've travelled with this administration, and with Trump, and with Obama.
Problems did not start yesterday," the diplomat pointed out.
According to Ryabkov, the problems are related to the desire of the United States to impose its approaches on Russia on a number of issues.
The Deputy Minister of Foreign Affairs added that he would not risk making optimistic predictions about the prospects for improving relations and would not expect a change in Washington's position.
He explained that, with the exception of such areas as strategic stability and cyber security, there has been no progress.
At the same time, Russia calls on the United States to take a responsible approach in matters of international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and the Americans will listen to the arguments of common sense.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov stated at a meeting with U.S. Secretary of State Anthony Blinken that Moscow was ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
Virologist warned of the danger of vaccinating with a nasal COVID-19 vaccine outside of hospitals
People who receive a COVID-19 nasal spray vaccine may develop an allergy and need medical assistance, so the first vaccination points for this vaccine should not be set up in airports and shopping centres.
This was reported by TASS by the virologist, corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the laboratory of bionanotechnology, microbiology and virology of Novosibirsk State University, Sergey Netesov.
It's easier to set up vaccination points for the nasal vaccine in airports and shopping malls, but I would do it only in medical facilities at first.
The fact is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that the person sit next to the doctor's office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy medications that work literally within a minute or two, which is sometimes very necessary," said Netesov.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccination in shopping centres once experience with the use of the drug has been accumulated.
He also stressed that when using the nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
However, there is a risk that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person being vaccinated blows their nose after being sprayed.
Picture by numbers on canvas, anime "Demon Slayer" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
Colouring by numbers is interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many people love to draw, but sometimes they lack the ability or skills.
This is a simple but very enjoyable activity that allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
There are many unusual paintings and “untrodden” themes in the assortment!
We are developing current topics on our own, and we are trying to make sure that you are pleased with the result!
It's all very simple!
When painting, the outlines, applied to the canvas, do not “melt”, they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered so as not to get lost in the paint.
The finished picture will be a bright element of the interior, the highlight of the interior, attracting attention at first sight.
But this picture was not painted by just any artist.
You yourself drew her.
Do it with your own hands!
Serbia has produced 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine
Sputnik V vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian Sputnik V vaccine, TASS quoted the country’s Minister of Innovation and Technological Development, Nenad Popovic, as saying.
"At the Torlak state institution, about 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine have been produced so far, and we expect at least 4 million doses to be produced in the coming period," said Popovic.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular among the Serbs.
In connection with this, the republic is planning to make an additional purchase of a million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
Serbia’s Minister of Innovation and Technological Development also expressed interest in the production of the “Sputnik V” nasal vaccine and the “Sputnik Light” drug on the country’s territory.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin announced that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of its domestic coronavirus vaccine, Sputnik V, to Serbia.
The lama is said to be the true believers who make up the church.
Whether these true believers exist or not, we cannot know.
Each of us would like to be such a true believer, and each of us tries to be one.
But no one should say of themselves, or of those who believe as he does, that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say of themselves that they are truly believers, then so can others.
Benartti Prime Orto S1000 mattress 145х190.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different sides with varying levels of firmness, the total height of the mattress is 22 cm.
The maximum permissible load per sleeping place is 150 kg.
The mattress is based on an independent S1000 spring unit (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is contained in a separate fabric pocket, allowing the springs to properly distribute the body's weight.
To provide additional protection for the spring block, an insulating layer of felt has been added to separate the mattress filling from the springs.
On one side of the mattress is a 3cm layer of coconut coir, which adds extra firmness and longevity to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress a layer of 3cm coconut coir and 1cm natural latex has been added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made of cotton Jacquard, quilted with an environmentally friendly Hollcon material.
The fabric is treated with a special antibacterial impregnation Sanitized (Sweden).
The impregnation ensures the complete destruction of mold, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for flipping, as well as aerators for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced around the perimeter with an artificial latex frame, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Can you remind me how the marathon went at the 2021 World Championship?
Do you see the ski track, along which the participants of the race should finish in a classic style?
Attention, question - what is Clebo doing to the right of Bolshunov and how does he want to get onto the ski track if he was behind him on the turn before the gate?
And the “best finisher” at 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It was a long time ago...
I was, in fact, not even the driver.
He had the right, but he didn't know how to drive.
They offered to drive 250 km in one direction on a MAZ!
The young, bad, agreed.
The owner is nearby, drinking vodka, and I'm driving.
First, as a king, he occupied the axis!
A column formed up behind me.
I missed.
Then the belt on the G.U.R. broke.
Then we were stopped by the police.
There was a group of people walking, and their car broke down.
It needs to be towed.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk and the driver was inexperienced.
And to him, what are you, drunk?
You don't trip, you don't fall.
In front of us with the flashing lights and forward!
It seems to me that he can't get out of the advertisement, and he has the right to be upset.
Pevtsov is saying the same thing: about returning the retirement age.
Long ago, all budgets have been drawn up taking into account the billions that pre-pensioners have not received.
Who is feeding them this rubbish?
UK records 1,239 Omicron cases in 24 hours - TASS in Russian
In one day, 1,239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of the coronavirus were identified in the United Kingdom.
Sky News reports this.
In particular, 1196 new cases of the "omicron" strain were recorded in England, 38 people contracted the new variant of the infection in Scotland, and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of COVID-19 cases caused by the new strain in the UK has reached 3,137.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine in a pessimistic forecast calculated that 75,000 people could die in England due to an outbreak of the coronavirus caused by the "omicron" strain by April.
Peskov warned of the suffering of Western countries that impose anti-Russian sanctions
The press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in case of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including due to the alleged “invasion” of the territory of the country.
“It is impossible to impose sanctions on Russia without suffering the pain yourself”, the official representative of the Kremlin stated on the air of the Russia-1 television channel.
Peskov says that "everyone in the world understands this."
Earlier it was reported that the United States is considering the possibility of imposing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to introduce restrictions that will make it difficult to convert rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is sure that this is impossible.
From reasonable people - correspondingly reasonable comments!
Something about these simple-to-the-point-of-nausea recipes already makes me nauseous.
Apparently, they've run out of ideas.
Even in my distant childhood, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to me to compare a piece of bread with jam to a cake.
Ksenia, you do not need to bring anything to my mind; my mind must work it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind divided from the Spirit to apprehend" - what are you talking about?!
Imagine having to explain this to a dumb kid, how would you do it?
(Keep in mind that a child up to 3-5 years old still has open channels of communication with the subtle world, and the child may know more than you do!)
New Caledonia rejects idea of independence from France
According to the final results of the third referendum on the independence of New Caledonia, the overwhelming majority of participants refused to leave France.
The French TV channel BFM.TV reported this on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted were against independence.
Independence from France was supported by 3.51 per cent of the inhabitants of the archipelago in the South Pacific.
2.99% of ballots were annulled.
Turnout on the day was very low, with only around 55% of the archipelago's residents making it to the polling stations.
According to experts, the low turnout is due to calls by separatists to boycott the referendum because of the coronavirus.
Paris refused to change the date of the referendum.
In October 2020, residents of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
In 2018, a referendum on independence was already held in the region.
Most residents supported the archipelago being part of France.
New Caledonia is located almost 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France claimed New Caledonia as its territory.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, and the territory is endowed with a special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and New Caledonia's administration allows the region to hold a referendum on its independence every two years.
Boris, if you don't know the story, don't write.
The name of the city of Arsk is derived from the Bulgar-Tatar word "artysh" (juniper).
The Udmurts (ary in Tatar) live in the northern regions of the Baltazin and Kukmor districts.
The Udmurts are excellent, hard-working people, who have preserved their language, live in friendship with the Tatars, and know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don't know your age, but I want to tell you that the Motherland will never abandon you.
The idiots, shouting out “tough slogans”, will be thrown out.
I tell you this with complete confidence, based on my life experience.
Don't spit in the well, you might have to drink the water!
WHO considers “omicron” to be less dangerous than “delta”
The World Health Organization (WHO) preliminarily considers that “omicron” is less dangerous than the delta strain of the coronavirus.
At the same time, there are data on a decrease in the effectiveness of vaccines when infected with a new variant of COVID-19.
According to information as of December 9, “omicron” has been registered in 63 countries.
"The preliminary data and the significantly altered antigenic profile of the "omicron" strain allow us to assume a reduction in the effectiveness of the vaccine against infection and the transmission of the variant.
According to preliminary findings from South Africa, it ("the severity of the disease" - rare) may be less severe than "delta"", the WHO technical note said.
The organization notes that so far, all registered cases of "omicron" in the EU have been mild or asymptomatic.
However, the new strain, according to preliminary data, spreads faster than the delta.
Two cases of infection with the Omicron strain have been registered in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center reported.
The head of Rospotrebnadzor, Anna Popova, stated that there is currently no reliable data that the new coronavirus variant is less dangerous than others.
In fact, the lack of sun is very critical for us, southern people.
During 10 days spent in Saint Petersburg some time in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our flight back took off above the clouds.
Then I only understood what I had been missing all the time in beautiful Saint Petersburg.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To experience something never experienced before, to drink in space with your eyes, your mouth and your skin!
Those who see only water in the ocean,
The one on the ground doesn't notice the mountains.
Your Adventure World +7 905 989 9172 What's App
Siberian Expeditions - we are capable of spoiling even the worst mood!
Svetlana S., no, no, they don’t give in.
If your beloved, with whom you intend to spend the rest of your life, doesn’t give in to your requests, it means that he is a parasite who doesn’t want to give back as much as he takes.
And the problem with women is that they themselves are slowly shouldering everything.
And who is to blame here, if she herself took up the reins?
Ukraine has named four scenarios for Zelensky
Former deputy of the Verkhovna Rada, Vadim Denisenko, listed four scenarios for the development of events for the president of Ukraine, Vladimir Zelensky, in 2022.
In his opinion, the head of state may be left without the support of the West, and, possibly, will make compromises on Donbas.
On Sunday, December 12, Denisenko spoke about this in a publication on the Glavred portal.
The first option, which Denisenko called an “ideal storm,” assumes that key Western countries will stop supporting Ukraine, reaching an agreement about the country’s future without its participation.
Such a development would contribute to the deep crisis that Kiev may face in 2023.
“At the same time, there is a decrease in the price of key goods that we traditionally export <...> internal protests and confrontation between the authorities and key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Ed.)”, added the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the development of the situation - "war against all".
This forecast will come true in the event of high turbulence in world politics, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
As a result of such a situation, the Ukrainian leadership may make compromises on Donbas, which could lead to confrontation within the country.
At the end of the summer, Zelensky's positions will weaken, the likelihood of such a situation, according to the former MP, is up to 50-55%.
The third option for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is the confrontation between groups of the population that disagree with Zelensky and the president, which could result in the seizure of control over the power bloc and the implementation of “populist initiatives”.
During such a version of the crisis, Zelensky will begin to “reformat power”, added Denisenko.
Another scenario is turning Zelensky into a ‘father of the nation’.
This can be brought about by some event that is a great shock to the society.
"The event must be large enough to cause a reaction from external partners and lead to an increase in support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a man-made disaster, or the aggressive actions of Russia, believes the former deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has repeatedly rejected any possibility of an "attack" on Ukraine.
In Moscow, they noted that it is the Ukrainian authorities, NATO, and the United States that are increasing military activity near Russian borders.
Earlier, on November 11, data from the Rating sociological group showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president had fallen to record low levels, standing at 19.3%.
This is the lowest rating since he took office.
Analysts predicted a situation in which, in the event of upcoming presidential elections in Ukraine, only 21.8% would vote for Zelensky, while 14.5% would vote for the country's former president, Petro Poroshenko.
At the same time, among all those surveyed, only 19.3% expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena shower system (74182)
The KAISER Sena (74182) shower system is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability, and this is also confirmed by numerous customer reviews on third-party online resources.
When purchasing this product from us, you also receive a guarantee from us on the quality and operability of the product.
We use transport companies to deliver anywhere in Russia and to any region.
In the event that you find any defects, we will happily return the full amount that you paid.
When you call the operator, you can get a personal discount on this product.
Please leave a review after use.
Thanks to the author for the story about a great athlete, I didn't know that Elena Shushunova had died, it's very upsetting to learn such things.
I remember how I cheered for her at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such was the intensity of the emotions, I remember the joy when Elena won.
They were also happy about all the other victories, just as they had been for Salnikov, for the football players, for all the Soviet athletes back then.
Once, I saw a documentary on TV about one of the Central American countries, and there, watermelons were rolled up the gangway onto the ship, like barrels.
Watermelons were the size of monsters.
I myself have worked many times in my youth on the collection and loading of watermelons in the Astrakhan region, and have never seen a watermelon weighing more than a pud.
I buy watermelons that weigh 4-5 kg directly from the garden, and not earlier than the beginning of August.
Balconette bra with soft lace cups (size: 90E, colour: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, item number: 12008).
Balconette bra with soft lace cups on frames.
The lower part of the cup is reinforced with non-elastic transparent fabric.
The side inner cup, in the bra strap attachment area, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric in the fold, without additional seams for comfort.
It is this element that prevents the lace from stretching.
The wealth of the lace can be appreciated thanks to the festoon along the neckline and under the breasts.
The vertical ribs on the side panels of the single-layer microfiber prevent the fabric from twisting on larger sizes.
I didn't like the article at all, it was nasty and venomous.
Walked up to people you don't know anything about.
But now, many people like to break people down into atoms.
I hope that the commenters are all honorable and decent, and that they know what they're talking about.
In Moscow in the evening, you think 100 times over whether to go to the store alone, migrants are everywhere, there are throngs of them.
They consider themselves the owners.
And what about child benefits and pensions? Are you serious?
The benefits are pittance and they pay them for a maximum of 3 years, pensions are 12000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics has been paid for a long time in our country and is very expensive.
People are from another planet.
France is doing badly, and we are doing well?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact texture, comfortable elasticity and rigidity, wear-resistant and long-lasting properties.
The BeautySon product from the Sens series is designed for healthy sleep for people suffering from joint and cardiovascular diseases.
The design ensures uniform distribution of load over the surface and a pronounced comfortable effect.
The Beautyrest Sense Hard S600 mini-spring mattress is based on the S600 mini independent spring block with a reduced height of the springs.
The company Beautyson uses spandbond, coconut coir and polyurethane foam as internal fillers.
The Spenbond serves as an intermediate insulating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic carbon-infused foam is cut into a shape on the surface, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that provides the mattress with high moisture exchange and breathability properties.
The outer cover of the mattress is made of tight jacquard with synthetic fibers.
The material is strong and durable, does not wear out and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action in Red Square: “They give you 10 days for Evtushenko’s quote, here it is, the power of poetry!”
At the beginning of the week, 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
A HSE student was detained in Red Square with a placard that had the hashtag #poetrussiaismorethanpoet written on it.
This quote belongs to the writer Evgeny Evtushenko.
An administrative protocol was drawn up against Alexander for a repeated violation of the procedure for conducting a public action.
The first time he was arrested on January 23 at Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexey Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, now interest in it, unfortunately, has been lost, to the decline in general culture in Russia, and also a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems on the Internet under this hashtag," explains Alexander.
We contacted the young poet to find out the circumstances of his arrest and to learn more about the message of his message.
How did the police officers treat you when they detained you this time and previously?
What did the department ask about, and how did they comment on your actions?
This time the employees were more polite, the detention was maximum, courteous, as funny as that sounds in a certain context of this word.
In Pushkin, the OMON officers took them and took them hard.
They asked the standard questions, about the motive.
When they heard it, in principle, they looked, if not approvingly, then at least understandingly.
With the exception of the monkey bars, which were open on all four sides, everything was perfectly decent, but I knew what I was getting into.
And if after the action under this hashtag several people start writing their poems, I will not have spent these 10 days in vain.
Maxim, according to the protocol, talk to each other alone, even in the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe.
At public and official events, they speak in the language of the audience so that everyone can understand what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, or in their native language with an interpreter.
This is a protocol, and nothing more, by the way, Angela Merkel speaks Russian very well and yet uses a translator.
And at official events, notes are taken the old-fashioned way with a pen, and the stenographer is not required to know several languages.
If you don’t want to say anything, just say no!
But there is so much water.
Well, go as a tourist for six months to “the Andes, then Nepal”.
Prior to this, turn all assets into liquid shares.
And gradually sell these shares by opening an account at any bank in the world.
Sell not in dollars, but in a currency less dependent on the United States, for example, Swiss francs.
And then file for a divorce from America.
However, that's not all that keeps Americans in the US.
It keeps them confident that the U.S. is better than anywhere else.
This is how they're grown.
Hansgrohe Quattro 3-outlet mechanism (15930180).
Collection: Quattro; type: concealed installation mechanism; use: for tap, for bath, for shower; built-in systems: yes; installation type: built-in (in the wall); body material: brass; concealed installation mechanism: included; number of mounting holes: 1; country of origin of the brand: Germany; manufacturer's article number: 15930180; barcode: 4011097345239.
Additional information: a pressure regulator is required; delivery set: ceramic cartridge, sealing flange; 3 consumers; simultaneous operation of 2 consumers (showers) is possible; suitable for all Quattro external sets; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers explain how potatoes help in the fight against age-related disorders
The study showed that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help improve blood circulation and lower cholesterol levels.
The root vegetable contains B-group vitamins, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic acid and pantothenic acid.
All of these elements help the body's systems to function.
In addition, potatoes help with age-related disorders.
Its high fibre content makes it beneficial for the digestive system and regular consumption can also help to prevent high blood pressure and atherosclerosis.
However, for maximum benefit, the root vegetable is best stewed or cooked, rather than fried in oil.
The Daily Express previously warned that potatoes could be dangerous for diabetics, just like other foods with a high glycaemic index.
These are foods with carbohydrates that break down quickly into sugar, such as sugar, sweet sodas, white rice, and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant newspaper warned of a possible shortage of Russian table potatoes, noting a reduction in its production in personal subsidiary farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current shortage of products can only be met by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates will be removed from the "Yandex" search results
Candidates for elimination
In 2015, the right-holders from the RAEC/Media cluster created a list of the 100 largest pirate sites on the Runet, and most of them ceased to exist, says the CEO of the Institute for Internet Research, Karen Kazaryan.
However, some of them - Kinogo, Lostfilm, Filmix - managed to survive, thanks in part to the regular change of the domain name, he adds.
For example, Lostfilm, which is available in the search results of both "Yandex" and Google, can be used to watch pirated copies of the Netflix series "Squid Game" and "Tender" by director Anna Melikyan - the original series of Russia's largest video service ivi (which is part of AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available in search engine results, you can watch the new animated movie “Encanto”, but, by the quality of the video, it is a so-called screener (a pirated copy of the movie filmed in a movie theater).
The series “Univer. 10 Years Later” from the TNT channel (which is part of Gazprom-Media) is available on Filmix, which can also be found through search engines.
Svetlana M., excuse me, of course, but I would not give a damn whether the son was offended for his mother or not.
If we have some kind of misunderstanding, it's better not to get involved at all, with a mob in your path.
Of course, it's good that such things happen rarely.
A bra with soft cups without a frame and with a front fastening in coffee color, 135I GI1265.
The T-shaped back is internally reinforced with crossed elastic bands of cotton and lycra.
The bra is made of microfiber in combination with a mesh fabric for breathability.
Cups with cotton blend lining for a comfortable fit.
The unique Magiclift design (cross-over under the bust and along the neckline) to lift, separate and support the breasts.
The wide comfortable shoulder straps on the lining with microfleece are adjustable at the back.
Lyudmila, China is now at the forefront of space technology.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
"This idea developed by the Poles" - it would be more accurate to say that Poland only adapted the 1776 idea to its own needs, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan "The periphery is not Russia" appeared in 1848.
Which, in general and in principle, does not really change the essence of the matter.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream is to grow wings, her father is constantly tickling her.
Well, it's all very suspect.
Well, she's enrolled in a university, but what's next?
Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall lamp.
The wide circumference, framed by "molecules" of light, provides the most even and bright lighting of the space.
"Atomic" or "molecular" design, reflecting the nature and natural essence of each object, remains relevant and allows you to set accents in the interior to advantage.
One of the distinctive features of such lighting fixtures is the weightlessness of the design.
The illusion is created by thin, almost invisible wires which can be adjusted in height, making it look like the chandelier is hovering in the air.
The metal gold armature and matt white mini-chandeliers will easily complement any colour scheme, and the chandelier and wall lights presented in the collection will be a ready-made ensemble for lighting a living room, a bedroom, or an entrance hall.
Well, it's a matter of taste and color, as they say.
I really liked "Tarhun", of course, not the current one.
The freshly-squeezed juices in the tall glass cylinders were very tasty.
Three portions of syrup is too much, in my opinion.
Two was just right.
Dimatex Micro Ultimate mattress, size 160x190
Orthopedic spring mattress Micro Ultimate.
The model is convenient in that it has two different softness surfaces - high stiffness and a little more than average.
Only high-quality and premium fillers have been included in the product, which have proven themselves only from the best side.
Springs: in the center of the model is a block of independent "micropack" springs.
This means that there are 2000 springs per sleeping place that work completely autonomously.
It is their functioning that gives the unique point adjustment.
"Micropac" is the highest frequency of all the varieties of Dimax spring blocks, so it has a pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered premium.
Fillers: Above and below the springs are layers of coir and natural latex.
The only difference is the order of the tiles.
If one surface has latex, then the other has coconut coir.
Such a tandem of fillers has long carried the status of a classic, since it gives the mattress not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties.
If the coir provides proper support for the back, the latex gives surface adaptation to the human body.
The cover: the model comes in a ribbed knit Aloe Vera cover.
At the client's request, it can be made both removable and permanent.
The total height of the product is 27 cm, the recommended load on the sleeping place is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress has all the necessary certificates and documents that confirm its full safety and reliability in use.
The orthopedic foam that is used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certification.
Estonian scientists will search for life on Venus
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology, in collaboration with the Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies, is preparing three space missions to Venus to look for signs of life in the atmosphere, Aktuaalne kaamera reported on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year missions is to assess the habitability of Venus' clouds and then search for life there.
For the project, Tartu scientists have proposed instruments for measuring the acidity and oxygen content of Venus' clouds.
It has long been assumed that the clouds of Venus, the planet closest to Earth, are too acidic to support life, but Venus probably started out as an Earth-like planet.
A sample from Venus is due to arrive during the third mission.
If we find life there, the main question will be whether it is like the Earth's or different.
If it is very similar, it will be obvious that life on Earth did not start on Earth.
If it is different, it is more likely that life began on Earth," told the leader of the Estonian team of the Venus Life Finder project Mihkel Paabusalu.
A hat, not a phone...
Half a year of his time, and that's the price...
I'm already tired of this Chinese nonsense...
They can't make a quality phone...
Take anything, my Samsung has already survived three of them (friends have already thrown them out) and will survive even more!
Metaverses will change Russian business
The metaverse theme became popular in the fall of this year, when Mark Zuckerberg announced the transformation of Facebook into Meta.
This event was an important signal for the market: the largest player confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
This means that business in Russia, as well as all over the world, will invest in the creation of its own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, there is a trend towards creating distance interactions in the conditions of the pandemic, because people are tired of isolation and restrictions.
On the other hand, it is the result of the business's desire to develop ecosystems and adapt operational models to them.
The third - they are a logical continuation of the trend of digitization of assets, when any rights, securities, works of art, and even money pass into digital form.
Anna, you are right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you don't want to eat anything too fatty and harmful.
Of course, we will have the traditional Olivier salad and herring under a fur coat for the holiday, but no one is forcing me to eat it all at once.
You can eat it by the spoonful, try it - and that's enough.
After all, there are really ten days off ahead, and you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
And how much hell, time, and resources she had to spend on training.
And with a fifth-place finish, she left without gold.
And she also understands that 4 years until the next Olympics she won't make it, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And if you haven't been through just the sport or can't imagine all the circles of hell she's been through, DON'T LECTURE.
British economist failed to predict 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to make a forecast for 2022, because, in his opinion, such attempts will end in failure.
He wrote about this in an article for Project Syndicate.
An expert believes that next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the turnover.
The most important factor remains the coronavirus pandemic, and inflation is in second place, he believes.
O'Neill also admitted he did not know if the rise in prices was temporary or not.
As the expert pointed out, even before the pandemic it was clear that "the world of the central bank's endless generosity had run its course" and it was time to return to relations where interest rates, taking into account inflation, would correlate with expected GDP growth rates.
O'Neill said the continued ultra-loose monetary policy amid the pandemic may, according to some experts, lead to a new wave of inflation.
In addition, the issue of productivity growth, as well as poverty reduction and climate change, should be noted, concluded O'Neill.
Earlier, the head of Global Research at Otkritie Investment Mikhail Shulgin said that positive expectations for the value of the dollar in 2022 remain, although the growth potential will be less significant.
Among the risks to the value of the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and credit policy of the Federal Reserve, the dynamics of oil prices, and concerns amid the coronavirus pandemic.
I am forced to agree.
But there's one thing that pleases me: if you compare yourself to yourself, then five years ago there were fewer containers.
Now it's better.
There is progress, but it is slow.
There is another problem: there are many environmental initiatives in the cities, but people don't know about them.
Any kind of eco-taxi that takes waste from your home.
Yes, the point of receiving secondary raw materials is being used by the dregs of society.
Not many people put glass and metal in there.
Well, and the author...
Sausages with "cat food" at Soviet factories?
"Low-quality" chocolate in the Soviet Union?
Yes, they are not as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
I would now wrap Soviet sweets with white filling.
There are no more of them.
They're not releasing "The Pilot," and "Romancha" isn't the same at all...
EVA car mats (rhombus) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
EVA car mats are made from high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats consists of cells in the shape of rhombuses.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
The mats do not absorb and do not let water through.
All the dirt is evenly distributed in the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material from which the mats are made is elastic, wear-resistant and odourless.
It retains its properties in the temperature range from -50 to 50 °С.
Mats are easy to use and suitable for year-round use.
The EVA car mats cover the standard carpeting as much as possible, covering the area where the left foot rests.
The rear-seat tunnel is covered by a carpet.
The trim is made from a super-strong automotive strap.
The Dimax Praktik Basis Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practic Basis Plus in13 springless mattress consists of a single type of filler.
This is a 13-cm-high sheet of artificial latex.
Thanks to the characteristics of the material, the mattress has a symmetrical medium firmness on both sides.
The item is covered with a jacquard cover with a snap fastener on a removable or non-removable comfort layer.
PUF is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial latex (PUF) are characteristics similar to the natural analog, but at a lower cost.
Synthetic latex is resilient and elastic, but, unlike the natural material, it is more rigid.
It forms an anatomical surface of the mattress with high-quality support, which ensures a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not accumulate moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear-resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, inexpensive, and resistant to temperature changes, this mattress is ideal for setting up a sleeping place in a dacha or a country house.
Its advantages include universal medium hardness and a maximum load of up to 100 kg, which makes this mattress suitable for most categories of users.
Russians gave car dealers about 4.5% of the country's GDP
According to the results of 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2.784 trillion roubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than during the same period last year, according to statistical data from the Russian Automotive Market Research (RAPID) agency.
To put it in perspective, a similar amount (about 3 trillion roubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, at a meeting of the heads of state of the Shanghai Cooperation Organization, President Vladimir Putin said that this amount is comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) in 2020.
In terms of income, the Korean brand Kia is leading the Russian market.
In the first 10 months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 325.7 billion roubles, which is almost 24% more than a year earlier.
For the related Kia brand, the increase is even greater – more than 35%, and revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 279.3 billion roubles.
This brand is in the lead in terms of the increase in the average weighted price of a car – over the year, it rose by almost 21%, to 1.94 million roubles – only Changan, Chery, Geely, and Mercedes-Benz had a stronger price increase.
At the same time, sales volumes for Korean brands have not grown as significantly: according to the statistics of the Committee of Automobile Manufacturers of the Association of European Businesses in Russia, in quantitative terms, Kia sold 9.4% more cars over the same period than in the previous year.
Hyundai - by almost 12%.
Rounding out the top three in terms of sales volume in monetary terms is the Japanese Toyota - Russians spent 275.5 billion roubles on cars of this brand over 10 months, which is 14% more than a year earlier.
The Japanese are followed by Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 266.1 billion rubles (+75%) – the German premium brand has increased both the volume of sales (by 37%) and the average price of a car (almost by 28%, up to 8.2 million rubles).
“Mercedes-Benz simultaneously has good growth in sales and average price – more, for example, than BMW – hence the greater growth in financial capacity”, explained CEO of NAPA, Tatiana Arabadjieva.
In terms of sales growth, Chinese brands are also demonstrating fantastic figures, having significantly increased their financial capacity this year."
Russian Lada, in terms of income growth, is demonstrating average market figures (plus 28%); Russians spent 229.4 billion roubles on these cars in 10 months.
Companies whose car sales in units in 2021 fell are at the same level as last year in terms of financial capacity: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is actually in the red: over the course of 10 months, Russians spent 12 billion roubles on off-road vehicles and pickups of this brand, compared to 12.4 billion roubles a year earlier.
Against the backdrop of problems with the delivery of auto components and production disruptions that have affected the entire global automotive industry, car manufacturers continue to continuously adjust prices - AvtoVAZ, for example, raised the price of Lada models seven times in a year, the last price increase (by 8-10 thousand roubles) took place at the end of November.
Other car manufacturers regularly change the price tags on their products.
The volume of the Russian car market in monetary terms will continue to grow – in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation is contributing to this, as well as the desire of automakers to make up for past losses, experts believe.
With a shortage of cars, I think many carmakers have been able to pass on to the consumer some of the costs of past periods that they could not build into the price of cars before,
says VTB Capital auto industry analyst Vladimir Bespalov.
I believe that in financial terms, car manufacturers are feeling very good right now, supporting high margins on sales."
An indirect indicator of this is the rate of growth of the cost of cars, which is observed during 2021, the prices of new cars are growing faster than inflation, the expert clarifies.
In the long term, the market will grow both in terms of volume and value, but mainly due to inflation and the increasing complexity of the machines themselves, Bespalov predicts.
With an increase in supply, opportunities for price rises will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian car market will continue to grow in the coming year, even if the growth in car prices slows, automakers will be able to get their income from volumes, notes independent automotive industry consultant Sergey Burgazlyev.
Given the increased demand and limited supply, automakers are now looking to make the most profit from each car sold, notes Burgazlyev.
An increase in the production of cars is not expected at least for the next six months, and in Russia the rush is being fuelled by citizens' uncertainty about the future.
Against the backdrop of the situation on the market, cars turned out to be a good investment - a car bought a year ago, even with mileage, can now be sold for more than the initial price, notes the expert.
Biden spoke about the transfer of US military to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The United States has never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a “Russian invasion”.
U.S. President Joe Biden made such a statement.
"There has never been such a plan," said the head of the White House in response to a journalist's question about whether the United States had abandoned such an idea.
Biden noted that in the event of an escalation of the situation around Ukraine, Russia will face economic consequences.
At the same time, he stressed that the United States and NATO have no obligation to use military force to defend Ukraine in the event of an escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of using American troops unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invades Ukraine, the United States will deploy forces to NATO countries in eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, the Czech Republic and Estonia).
"We're going to have to put more American and NATO troops on the eastern flank, B9 - all those NATO countries that we have a sacred obligation to protect from any attack from Russia," Biden said.
Earlier, the press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, emphasized that Moscow has no intention of invading the territory of Ukraine.
At the same time, he indicated that Moscow sees the problem in the military use by Kiev of the drones supplied by Turkey, as well as in the fact that “American weapons are approaching our territory”.
I immediately leave such interviews.
If they already want to make me listen to screams, wait for hours, drink some incomprehensible drink and wash a cup at the interview - it is scary to imagine what will happen at work.
I'll find a normal place for myself, without the HR layer, where you can talk to the manager right away.
Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 mattress, 100x185 cm
The Promatex-Orient Monolith Combi 16 mattress, with an average height of 16, is made from alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-firm and the other is moderately firm.
The elegant white jacquard cover is quilted with polyester and has a zip around the edge.
Two types of stuffing.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillings.
Thin sheets of coconut coir are laid between the latex layers.
The layered structure of the mattress is characterized by increased wear resistance, durability, and resistance to loads.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, air-permeable material in terms of its characteristics.
The filling retains its shape and quickly recovers after loads.
Coconut coir strengthens the product and has natural antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows the creation of a load-resistant orthopedic sleeping place that will serve the buyers for many years.
Versatility and orthopedic support.
The mattress is suitable for people of different build and age.
A medium-firm surface is universal with a balanced combination of orthopaedics and comfort.
The back side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissue, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm sleeping surface is more relevant for those who need "relief" for their back and healthy posture.
The mattress is ideal for both a single person and a couple.
The latter will especially appreciate the presence of a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect, when vibrations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the opposite side, disturbing a person's sleep.
Studio desk-top easel, 20*24*54(65) cm, for a 40 cm canvas.
The 'Studio' desktop easel with height-adjustable top holder.
It is suitable for small-sized canvases.
The material is natural beech, varnished.
It will be convenient for both beginning and professional artists.
Smooth angle adjustment.
Equipped with a shelf for canvases and tablets.
The upper stretcher holds the canvas securely in place.
The maximum height of the easel is 65 cm, the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a scammer calls from such a number, like a "police officer" or another law enforcement official, it is not effective to hang up immediately, and it is unlikely that you will be able to add the number to a blacklist.
Because to confirm his lie about being connected to power structures, he quickly repeats the challenge and continues to threaten and cajole.
We need more useful recommendations for the people.
That's just nonsense...
I do not at all believe that this was the case.
They already don’t know what to come up with, who to accuse.
The Queen has been targeted.
And most importantly, in their opinion, everyone else is to blame, except for the very...
It would have been easier to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if our people care about their people.
Maybe all of the virus strains will disappear...
Just like in Japan... before the elections, they weakened the influence and there were fewer infections...
Felting wool set "Assortment No. 2" is 100% merino wool, wool 4x10 g.
The art of felting was born eight thousand years ago, but it was very difficult to find animal wool for this craft, and colored wool even more so.
But now, voila!
We present semi-fine natural wool for felting from a Russian manufacturer, for which you don't have to run around the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of felting wool make it possible to create bright and unique products.
For example, you can make a cute toy for yourself or your little one, an application for creativity, jewelry, interior decorations, and even clothes and accessories.
Imagine a pair of 'shaven' fluffy sheep on your shelf, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that would look great with your new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have...
Bring your ideas to life by "knocking down" this wonderful wool!
Maria Kartashova, what does "in response to this" mean?
I am not saying my thoughts out loud; I am cursing you all in my mind.
I mentally cut off the heads of everyone who didn't give me a seat, I mentally sent them to the curb and burned all the cars that got in my way, mentally all of them!
And I can even smile for you.
But I remember that thought is material!
Peter, Nicholas II did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even to scoundrels like Koba and his gang.
And Bloody Sunday is already the invention of the Bolsheviks.
Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190 mattress.
A mattress, hard on both sides.
The natural material, latex-coated coconut coir, does not cause allergic reactions and adds the necessary stiffness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per sleeping place) will provide unique comfort and correct back support during sleep.
Jacquard cotton cover, quilted at 200 g.
The hallcoon provides protection and comfort.
Maximum load per sleeping place: 130 kg.
My little horse.
Pony house with accessories, 6 in display.
A charming little pony lives in a cozy foldaway pink house.
If you open the house, a kitchen can be installed in one of its halves, and a table with treats for guests can be set up in the other half.
The pony has big beautiful eyes, its mane and tail can be brushed with a brush.
The set includes a 9cm pony, a comb, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), accessories: scissors (2 parts), a heart-shaped cake (2 parts), a juice bottle, 2 glasses, a teapot, a cup, and a saucer.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90x190x27 mattress weighs 27.9 kg.
The alternating layers of latex and firm coconut coir give the effect of enhanced body support.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress easily withstands a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
At the same time, there is no wave effect: the spouses, lying next to each other, do not roll towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model have undergone thorough quality control.
They are ventilated, do not become damp, and do not absorb odours.
Thanks to full air circulation, a unique microclimate is created, which is conducive to a healthy vacation.
High-strength hot-melt adhesive was used to secure the parts.
A film by Alexander Sokurov’s student has won the European “Oscar” for best editing
The Oscar-nominated Russian film, "Loosen Your Fists," received an award from the European Film Academy (it is also called the "European Oscar") in the "Best Editing" category, reports Moskovsky Komsomolets.
The competition jury, which voted online due to the difficult epidemiological situation, evaluated the outstanding skills of the film’s creators.
The maximum number of awards this time went to the film by Jasmila Zbanic (Bosnia) "Where Are You Going, Aida?"
The main character in the film is a translator for the United Nations mission, who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the drama "Unclenching the Fists", directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of Alexander Sokurov's workshop), this film tells about the difficult relationship between a powerful father and children who are growing up and want to break free from their father's authority in North Ossetia.
It was previously announced that the film had been nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As the regular friendly meetings of the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan and Turkey show, in my opinion, you, to put it mildly, are not in the know.
Just yesterday, the president of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KAMAZ enterprise.
